Introduction For more than 30 years, Federal law has required lenders to provide two different disclosure forms to consumers applying for a mortgage.
The law also has generally required two different forms at or shortly before closing on the loan.
Two different Federal agencies developed these forms separately, under two Federal statutes: the Truth in Lending Act (TILA) and the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (RESPA).
The information on these forms is overlapping and the language is inconsistent.
Not surprisingly, consumers often find the forms confusing.
It is also not surprising that lenders and settlement agents find the forms burdensome to provide and explain.
The Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (the Dodd-Frank Act) directs the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (the Bureau) to integrate the mortgage loan disclosures under TILA and RESPA sections 4 and 5.
Section 1032(f) of the Dodd-Frank Act mandated that the Bureau propose for public comment rules and model disclosures that integrate the TILA and RESPA disclosures by July 21, 2012.
The Bureau satisfied this statutory mandate and issued proposed rules and forms on July 9, 2012.
To accomplish this, the Bureau engaged in extensive consumer and industry research, analysis of public comment, and public outreach for more than a year.
After issuing the proposal, the Bureau conducted a large- scale quantitative study of its integrated disclosures with approximately 850 consumers, which concluded that the Bureaus integrated disclosures had on average statistically significant better performance than the current disclosures under TILA and RESPA.
The Bureau has now finalized a rule with new, integrated disclosures (TILA-RESPA rule).
The TILA-RESPA rule also provides a detailed explanation of how the forms should be filled out and used.
The first new form (the Loan Estimate ) is designed to provide disclosures that will be helpful to consumers in understanding the key features, costs, and risks of the mortgage loan for which they are applying.
The Loan Estimate must be provided to consumers no later than three business days after they submit a loan application.
The second form (the Closing Disclosure) is designed to provide disclosures that will be helpful to consumers in understanding all of the costs of the transaction.
The Closing Disclosure must be provided to consumers three business days before they close on the loan.
The forms use clear language and design to make it easier for consumers to locate key information, such as interest rate, monthly payments, and costs to close the loan.
The forms also provide more information to help consumers decide whether they can afford the loan and to compare the cost of different loan offers, including the cost of the loans over time.
The Loan Estimate and Closing Disclosure must be used for most closed- end consumer mortgages.
Home equity lines of credit, reverse mortgages, or mortgages secured by a mobile home or by a dwelling that is not attached to real property (i.e., land) must continue to use current disclosure forms required by TILA and RESPA separately.
The TILA-RESPA rule does not apply to loans made by persons who are not considered creditors because they make five or fewer mortgages as year.
Generally, the Loan Estimate and Closing Disclosure require the disclosure of categories of information that will vary due to the type of loan, the payment schedule of the loan, the fees charged, the terms of the transaction, and State law provisions.
The extent of these variations cannot be shown on a single, static example.
This Guide includes most of the requirements concerning completing the Loan Estimate and Closing Disclosure.
However, this Guide may not illustrate all of the permutations of the information required or omitted from the Loan Estimate or Closing Disclosure for any particular transaction.
Only the TILA-RESPA rule and its official interpretations can provide complete and definitive information regarding its requirements.1 (Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.
TILA- RESPA INTEGRATED DISCLOSURE Guide to the Loan Estimate and Closing Disclosure forms.
1 This Introduction was drafted by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau.
The TILA-RESPA rule consolidates four existing disclosures required under TILA and RESPA for closed-end credit transactions secured by real property into two forms: a Loan Estimate that must be delivered or placed in the mail no later than the third business day after receiving the consumers application, and a Closing Disclosure that must be provided to the consumer at least three business days prior to consummation.
Coverage 1026.19(e) and (f) The TILA-RESPA rule applies to most closed-end consumer credit transactions secured by real property.
Exceptions: HELOCS; Reverse mortgages; or Chattel-dwelling loans, such as loans secured by a mobile home or a home not attached to real property (i.e.
land); Persons or entities that make 5 or less mortgages in a calendar year; There is also a partial exemption for certain transactions associated with housing assistance loan programs for low- and moderate-income consumers.
( 1026.3(h)(2)) (2) The transaction is for the purpose of: (i) Down payment, closing costs, or other similar home buyer assistance, such as principal or interest subsidies; (ii) Property rehabilitation assistance; (iii) Energy efficiency assistance; or (iv) Foreclosure avoidance or prevention Certain types of loans that are currently subject to TILA but not RESPA are subject to the TILA- RESPA rules integrated disclosure requirements, including: Construction-only loans Loans secured by vacant land or by 25 or more acres Trusts Credit extended to certain trusts for tax or estate planning purposes also are covered by the TILA-RESPA rule.
If the transaction is primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, the transaction is subject to the regulation because in substance (if not form) consumer credit is being extended.
Credit extended for consumer purposes to certain trusts is considered to be credit extended to a natural person rather than credit extended to an organization.
In some instances, a creditor may extend 1656 credit for consumer purposes to a trust that a consumer has created for tax or estate planning purposes (or both).
Consumers sometimes place their assets in trust, with themselves or themselves and their families or other prospective heirs as beneficiaries, to obtain certain tax benefits and to facilitate the future administration of their estates.
During their lifetimes, however, such consumers may continue to use the assets and/or income of such trusts as their property.
A creditor extending credit to finance the acquisition of, for example, a consumers dwelling that is held in such a trust, or to refinance existing debt secured by such a dwelling, may prepare the note, security instrument, and similar loan documents for execution by a trustee, rather than the beneficiaries of the trust.
Regardless of the capacity or capacities in which the loan documents are executed, assuming the transaction is primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, the transaction is subject to the regulation because in substance (if not form) consumer credit is being extended.
In some jurisdictions, a financial institution financing a residential real estate transaction for an individual uses a land trust mechanism.
Title to the property is conveyed to the land trust for which the financial institution itself is trustee.
The underlying installment note is executed by the financial institution in its capacity as trustee and payment is secured by a trust deed, reflecting title in the financial institution as trustee.
In some instances, the consumer executes a personal guaranty of the indebtedness.
The note provides that it is payable only out of the property specifically described in the trust deed and that the trustee has no personal liability on the note.
Assuming the transactions are primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, these transactions are subject to the regulation because in substance (if not form) consumer credit is being extended.
Disclosure Requirements for Transactions not Covered 1026.3(h) and 1024.5(d)(2) The new Integrated Disclosures will not be used to disclose information about reverse mortgages, HELOCs, chattel-dwelling loans, or other transactions not covered by the TILA- RESPA rule.
Creditors originating these types of mortgages must continue to use, as applicable, the GFE, HUD-1, and Truth-in-Lending disclosures required under current law.
However, for transactions associated with the partial exemption for housing assistance loan programs for low and moderate income consumers: Creditors are not prohibited but are exempt from the requirement to provide the RESPA settlement cost booklet, RESPA GFE, RESPA settlement statement, Loan Estimate, Closing Disclosure, , application servicing disclosure statement requirements ,and Special Information Booklet.
1026.25 Generally: Loan Estimate 3 years Closing Disclosure 5 years.
Escrow Closing Notice and Partial Payment Policy Disclosure 2 years.
The creditor must retain copies of the Closing Disclosure (and all documents related to the Closing Disclosure) for five years after consummation.
The creditor, or servicer if applicable, must retain the Post-Consummation Escrow Cancellation Notice (Escrow Closing Notice) and the Post-Consummation Partial Payment Policy disclosure for two years.
For all other evidence of compliance with the Integrated Disclosure provisions of Regulation Z (including the Loan Estimate) creditors must maintain records for three years after consummation of the transaction.
Additionally, if the creditor sells or transfers its interest in the mortgage, the new servicer/owner and the creditor must retain the Closing Disclosure for the remainder of the 5 years period.
In other words, the Closing Disclosure must be retained for 5 years from the date of consummation.
Records can be maintained by any method that reproduces disclosures accurately, including computer programs.
When do I have to start using the new Integrated Disclosures?
The new Integrated Disclosures must be provided by a creditor or mortgage broker that receives an application from a consumer for a closed-end credit transaction secured by real property on or after August 1, 2015.
Creditors will still be required to use the GFE, HUD-1, and Truth-in-Lending forms for applications received prior to August 1, 2015.
As the applications received prior to August 1, 2015 are consummated, withdrawn, or cancelled, the use of the GFE, HUD-1, and Truth-in- Lending forms will no longer be used for most mortgage loans.
Requirements that take effect on August 1, 2015 regardless of receipt of application.
There are restrictions on certain activity prior to a consumers receipt of the Loan Estimate.
These restrictions include: Imposing fees on a consumer before the consumer has received the Loan Estimate and indicated an intent to proceed with the transaction ( 1026.19(e)(2)(i)); Providing written estimates of terms of costs specific to consumers before they receive the Loan Estimate without a written statement informing the consumer that the terms and costs may change.
Requiring the submission of documents verifying information related to the consumers application before providing the Loan Estimate.
Provides that a consumer may indicate an intent to proceed with a transaction in any manner the consumer chooses, unless a particular manner of communication is required by the creditor.
The creditor must document this communication to satisfy the requirements of 1026.25.
For example, oral communication in person immediately upon delivery of the disclosures required by 1026.19(e)(1)(i) is sufficiently indicative of intent.
Oral communication over the phone, written communication via email, or signing a pre-printed form are also sufficiently indicative of intent if such actions occur after receipt of the disclosures required by 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
However, a consumers silence is not indicative of intent because it cannot be documented to satisfy the requirements of 1026.25.
For example, a creditor or third party may not deliver the disclosures, wait for some period of time for the consumer to respond, and then charge the consumer a fee for an appraisal if the consumer does not respond, even if the creditor or third party disclosed that it would do so.
Can a creditor use the new Disclosures before August 1, 2015?
This new definition of application is similar to the current definition but the Bureau has revised the definition of application to remove the seventh catch-all element of the current definition under Regulation X, that is, any other information deemed necessary by the loan originator.
An application means the submission of a consumers financial information for purposes of obtaining an extension of credit.
An application consists of the submission of the following six pieces of information: The consumers name; The consumers income; The consumers social security number to obtain a credit report; The property address; An estimate of the value of the property; and The mortgage loan amount sought.
Application Format An application may be submitted in written or electronic format, and includes a written record of an oral application.
(Comment 2(a)(3)-1) Additional Information Needed by Creditor This definition of application does not prevent a creditor from collecting whatever additional information it deems necessary in connection with the request for the extension of credit.
However, once a creditor has received the six pieces of information discussed above, it has an application for purposes of the requirement for delivery of the Loan Estimate to the consumer, including the three-business-day timing requirement.
(Comment 1026.2(a)(3)(1)) A creditor or other person may not condition providing the Loan Estimate by requiring the consumer to submit documents verifying information related to the consumers mortgage loan application before providing the Loan Estimate.
(Comment 1026.19(e)(2)(iii)) For example: A creditor may ask for the sale price and address of the property, but may not require the consumer to provide a purchase and sale agreement to support the information the consumer provides orally before the creditor provides the Loan Estimate.
A mortgage broker may ask for the names, account numbers, and balances of the consumers checking and savings accounts, but the mortgage broker may not require the consumer to provide bank statements or similar documentation to support the information orally provided by the consumer before the creditor provides the Loan Estimate.
Assume a creditor provides a consumer with an application form containing 20 questions about the consumers credit history and the collateral value.
The consumer submits answers to nine of the questions and informs the creditor that the consumer will contact the creditor the next day with answers to the other 11 questions.
Although the consumer provided nine pieces of information, the consumer did not provide a social security number.
The creditor has not yet received an application for purposes of 1026.2(a)(3).
Assume a creditor requires all applicants to submit 20 pieces of information.
The consumer submits only six pieces of information and informs the creditor that the consumer will contact the creditor the next day with answers to the other 14 questions.
The six pieces of information provided by the consumer were the consumers name, income, social security number, property address, estimate of the value of the property, and the mortgage loan amount sought.
Even though the creditor requires 14 additional pieces of information to process the consumers request for a mortgage loan, the creditor has received an application for the purposes of 1026.2(a)(3) and therefore must comply with the relevant requirements under 1026.19.
If a consumer does not have a social security number, the creditor may substitute whatever unique identifier the creditor uses to obtain a credit report on the consumer.
For example, a creditor may collect a Tax Identification Number from a consumer who does not have a social security number, such as a foreign national.
Section 1026.19(a)(1)(iii) permits the imposition of a fee to obtain the consumers credit history prior to the delivery of the disclosures required under 1026.19(a)(1)(i).
Section 1026.19(e)(2)(i)(B) permits the imposition of a fee to obtain the consumers credit report prior to the delivery of the disclosures required under 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
Whether, or when, such fees are received does not affect whether an application has been received for the purposes of the definition in 1026.2(a)(3) and the timing requirements in 1026.19(a)(1)(i) and (e)(1)(iii).
For example, if, in a transaction subject to 1026.19(e)(1)(i), a creditor receives the six pieces of information identified under 1654 1026.2(a)(3)(ii) on Monday, June 1, but does not receive a credit report fee from the consumer until Tuesday, June 2, the creditor does not comply with 1026.19(e)(1)(iii) if it provides the disclosures required under 1026.19(e)(1)(i) after Thursday, June 4.
The three- business-day period beings on Monday, June 1, the date the creditor received the six pieces of information.
The waiting period does not begin on Tuesday, June 2, the date the creditor received the credit report fee.
Comment 2016.19(e)(1)(iii)-3) Rejections/Withdrawals If the creditor determines within the three-business-day period that the consumers application will not or cannot be approved on the terms requested by the consumer, or if the consumer withdraws the application within that period, the creditor does not have to provide the Loan Estimate.
However, if the creditor does not provide the Loan Estimate, it will not have complied with the Loan Estimate requirements under Regulation Z if it later consummates the transaction on the terms originally applied for by the consumer.
Consumer Amendments If a consumer amends an application and a creditor determines the amended application may proceed, then the creditor is required to comply with the Loan Estimate requirements, including delivering or mailing a Loan Estimate within three business days of receiving the amended or resubmitted application.
Fees 1026.19(e)(2)(i)(A) A creditor or other person may not impose any fee on a consumer in connection with the consumers application for a mortgage transaction until the consumer has received the Loan Estimate and has indicated intent to proceed with the transaction.
This restriction includes limits on imposing: Application fees; Appraisal fees; Underwriting fees; and Other fees imposed on the consumer.
The only exception to this exclusion is for a bona fide and reasonable fee for obtaining a consumers credit report.
A fee is imposed by a person if the person requires a consumer to provide a method for payment, even if the payment is not made at that time.
This would include, for example: A creditor or mortgage broker requiring the consumer to provide a check to pay for a processing fee before the consumer receives the Loan Estimate, even if the check is not to be cashed until after the Loan Estimate is received and the consumer has indicated intent to proceed.
A creditor or mortgage broker requiring the consumer to provide a credit card number for a processing fee before the consumer receives the Loan Estimate, even it the credit card will not be charged until after the Loan Estimate is received and the consumer has indicated intent to proceed.
Intent to Proceed 1026.19(e)(2)(i)(A) A consumer indicates intent to proceed with the transaction when the consumer communicates, in any manner, that the consumer chooses to proceed after the Loan Estimate has been delivered, unless a particular manner of communication is required by the creditor.
This may include: Oral communication in person immediately upon delivery of the Loan Estimate; Oral communication over the phone, written communication via email, or signing a pre- printed form after receipt of the Loan Estimate.
A consumers silence is not indicative of intent to proceed.
The creditor must document this communication to satisfy the record retention requirements of 1026.25.
General Requirements 1026.19(e) and 1026.37 For closed-end credit transactions secured by real property (other than reverse mortgages), the creditor is required to provide the consumer with good-faith estimates of credit costs and transaction terms on a new form called the Loan Estimate.
This form integrates and replaces the existing RESPA GFE and the initial TIL for these transactions.
The creditor is generally required to provide the Loan Estimate within three-business days of the receipt of the consumers loan application.
Loan Estimate must contain a good faith estimate of credit costs and transaction terms.
If any information necessary for an accurate disclosure is unknown, the creditor must make the disclosure based on the best information reasonably available at the time the disclosure is provided to the consumer, and use due diligence in obtaining the information.
19(e)(1)(i)-1) The reasonably available standard requires that the creditor, acting in good faith, exercise due diligence in obtaining information.
Comment 1026.17(c)(2)(i) For example, the creditor must at a minimum utilize generally accepted calculation tools, but need not invest in the most sophisticated computer program to make a particular type of calculation.
The creditor normally may rely on the representations of other parties in obtaining information.
For example, the creditor might look to the consumer for the time of consummation, to insurance companies for the cost of insurance, or to realtors for taxes and escrow fees.
The creditor may utilize estimates in making disclosures even though the creditor knows that more precise information will be available by the point of consummation.
Loan Estimate must be in writing and contain the information prescribed in 1026.37 Content of disclosures for certain mortgage transactions.
The creditor must disclose only the specific information set forth in 1026.37(a) through (n), as shown in the Bureaus form in appendix H-24.
1026.37(o) Delivery must satisfy the timing and method of delivery requirements.
The creditor is responsible for delivering the Loan Estimate or placing it in the mail no later than the third business day after receiving the application.
The disclosures required by 1026.19(e)(1)(i) must be delivered not later than three business days after the creditor receives the consumers application.
For example, if an application is received on Monday, the creditor satisfies this requirement by either hand delivering the disclosures on or before Thursday, or placing them in the mail on or before Thursday, assuming each weekday is a business day.
For purposes of 1026.19(e)(1)(iii)(A), the term business day means a day on which the creditors offices are open to the public for carrying out substantially all of its business functions.
The seven-business-day waiting period begins when the creditor delivers the disclosures or places them in the mail, not when the consumer receives or is considered to have received the disclosures.
For example, if a creditor delivers the early disclosures to the consumer in person or places them in the mail on Monday, June 1, consummation may occur on or after Tuesday, June 9, the seventh business day following delivery or mailing of the early disclosures, because, for the purposes of 1026.19(e)(1)(iii)(B), Saturday is a business day, pursuant to 1026.2(a)(6).
The creditor may determine within the three business- day period that the application will not or cannot be approved on the terms requested, such as when a consumers credit score is lower than the minimum score required for the terms the consumer applied for, or the consumer applies for a type or amount of credit that the creditor does not offer.
In that case, or if the consumer withdraws the application within the three business- day period by, for instance, informing the creditor that he intends to take out a loan from another creditor within the three-business-day period, the creditor need not make the disclosures required under 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
If the creditor fails to provide early disclosures and the transaction is later consummated on the terms originally applied for, then the creditor does not comply with 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
If, however, the consumer amends the application because of the creditors unwillingness to approve it on the terms originally applied for, no violation occurs for not providing disclosures based on those original terms.
But the amended application is a new application subject to 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
If consummation occurs within three business days after a creditors receipt of an application for a transaction that is secured by a consumers interest in a timeshare plan described in 11 U.S.C.
101(53D), a creditor complies with 1026.19(e)(1)(iii) by providing the disclosures required under 1026.19(f)(1)(i) instead of the disclosures required under 1026.19(e)(1)(i) Creditors may only use revised or corrected Loan Estimates when specific requirements are met.
Creditors generally may not issue revisions to Loan Estimates because they later discover technical errors, miscalculations, or underestimations of charges.
Creditors are permitted to issue revised Loan Estimates only in certain situations such as when changed circumstances result in increased charges.
( 1026.19(e)3)(iv)) Comment 1026.19(e)(3)(iv) Revised estimates.
Pursuant to 1026.19(e)(3)(i) and (ii), good faith is determined by calculating the difference between the estimated charges originally provided pursuant to 1026.19(e)(1)(i) and the actual charges paid by or imposed on the consumer.
Section 1026.19(e)(3)(iv) provides the exception to this rule.
Pursuant to 1026.19(e)(3)(iv), for purposes of determining good faith under 1026.19(e)(3)(i) and (ii), the creditor may use a revised estimate of a charge instead of the amount originally disclosed under 1026.19(e)(1)(i) if the revision is due to one of the reasons set forth in 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(A) through (F).
The revised disclosures may reflect increased charges only to the extent that the reason for revision, as identified in 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(A) through (F), actually increased the particular charge.
For example, if a consumer requests a rate lock extension, then the revised disclosures may reflect a new rate lock extension fee, but the fee may be no more than the rate lock extension fee charged by the creditor in its usual course of business, and other charges unrelated to the rate lock extension may not change.
In order to comply with 1026.25, creditors must retain records demonstrating compliance with the requirements of 1026.19(e).
For example, if revised disclosures are provided because of a changed circumstance under 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(A) affecting settlement costs, the creditor must be able to show compliance with 1026.19(e) by documenting the original estimate of the cost at issue, explaining the reason for revision and how it affected settlement costs, showing that the corrected disclosure increased the estimate only to the extent that the reason for revision actually increased the cost, and showing that the timing requirements of 1026.19(e)(4) were satisfied.
However, the documentation requirement does not require separate corrected disclosures for each change.
A creditor may provide corrected disclosures reflecting multiple changed circumstances, provided that the creditors documentation demonstrates that each correction complies with the requirements of 1026.19(e).
In certain situations, mortgage brokers may provide a Loan Estimate.
As discussed in more detail in section 6.3 below, if a mortgage broker receives a consumers application, either the creditor or the mortgage broker may provide the Loan Estimate.
Section 1026.19(e)(1)(ii)(A) provides that if a mortgage broker receives a consumers application, either the creditor or the mortgage broker must provide the consumer with the disclosures required under 1026.19(e)(1)(i) in accordance with 1026.19(e)(1)(iii).
Section 1026.19(e)(1)(ii)(A) also provides that if the mortgage broker provides the required disclosures, it must comply with all relevant requirements of 1026.19(e).
This means that mortgage broker should be read in the place of creditor for all provisions of 1026.19(e), except to the extent that such a reading would create responsibility for mortgage brokers under 1026.19(f).
To illustrate, comment 19(e)(4)(ii)-1 states that creditors comply with the requirements of 1026.19(e)(4) if the revised disclosures are reflected in the disclosures required by 1026.19(f)(1)(i).
Mortgage broker could not be read in place of creditor in comment 19(e)(4)(ii)-1 because mortgage brokers are not responsible for the disclosures required under 1026.19(f)(1)(i).
In addition, 1026.19(e)(1)(ii)(A) provides that the creditor must ensure that disclosures provided by mortgage brokers comply with all requirements of 1026.19(e), and that disclosures provided by mortgage brokers that do comply with all such requirements satisfy the creditors obligation under 1026.19(e).
The term mortgage broker, as used in 1026.19(e)(1)(ii), has the same meaning as in 1026.36(a)(2).
Section 1026.19(e)(1)(ii)(B) provides that if a mortgage broker provides any disclosure required under 1026.19(e), the mortgage broker must also comply with the requirements of 1026.25(c) For example, if a mortgage broker provides the disclosures required it must maintain records for three years.
If a mortgage broker issues any disclosure required under 1026.19(e) in the creditors place, the creditor remains responsible under 1026.19(e) for 1026.19(e)(1)(i), it must maintain records for three years, in compliance with 1026.25(c)(1)(i) ensuring that the requirements of 1026.19(e) have been satisfied.
For example, if a mortgage broker receives a consumers application and provides the consumer with the disclosures required under 1026.19(e)(1)(i), the creditor does not satisfy the requirements of 1026.19(e)(1)(i) if it provides duplicative disclosures to the consumer.
In the same example, even if the broker provides an erroneous disclosure, the creditor is responsible and may not issue a revised disclosure correcting the error.
The creditor is expected to maintain communication with the broker to ensure that the broker is acting in place of the creditor.
Requirement to use the Loan Estimate form 1026.37(o) For any loans subject to the TILA-RESPA rule that are federally related mortgage loans subject to RESPA (which will include most mortgages), form H-24 is a standard form, meaning creditors must use form H-24.
For other loans subject to the TILA-RESPA rule that are not federally related mortgage loans, form H-24 is a model form, meaning creditors are not strictly required to use form H-24, but the disclosures must contain the exact same information and be made with headings, content, and format substantially similar to form H-24.
( 1026.37(o)(3)(ii)) A federally related mortgage loan ( 1024.2(b) is defined as: (1) Any loan (other than temporary financing, such as a construction loan): (i) That is secured by a first or subordinate lien on residential real property, including a refinancing of any secured loan on residential real property, upon which there is either: (A) Located or, following settlement, will be constructed using proceeds of the loan, a structure or structures designed principally for occupancy of from one to four families (including individual units of condominiums and cooperatives and including any related interests, such as a share in the cooperative or right to occupancy of the unit); or (B) Located or, following settlement, will be placed using proceeds of the loan, a manufactured home; and (ii) For which one of the following paragraphs applies.
The loan: (A) Is made in whole or in part by any lender that is either regulated by or whose deposits or accounts are insured by any agency of the Federal Government; (B) Is made in whole or in part, or is insured, guaranteed, supplemented, or assisted in any way: (1) By the Secretary of the Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) or any other officer or agency of the Federal Government; or (2) Under or in connection with a housing or urban development program administered by the Secretary of HUD or a housing or related program administered by any other officer or agency of the Federal Government; (C) Is intended to be sold by the originating lender to the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (or its successors), or a financial institution from which the loan is to be purchased by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (or its successors); (D) Is made in whole or in part by a creditor, as defined in section 103(g) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act (15 U.S.C.
1602(g)), that makes or invests in residential real estate loans aggregating more than $1,000,000 per year.
For purposes of this definition, the term creditor does not include any agency or instrumentality of any State, and the term residential real estate loan means any loan secured by residential real property, including single-family and multifamily residential property; (E) Is originated either by a dealer or, if the obligation is to be assigned to any maker of mortgage loans specified in paragraphs (1)(ii)(A) through (D) of this definition, by a mortgage broker; or (F) Is the subject of a home equity conversion mortgage, also frequently called a reverse mortgage, issued by any maker of mortgage loans specified in paragraphs (1)(ii)(A) through (D) of this definition.
(2) Any installment sales contract, land contract, or contract for deed on otherwise qualifying residential property is a federally related mortgage loan if the contract is funded in whole or in part by proceeds of a loan made by any maker of mortgage loans specified in paragraphs (1)(ii) (A) through (D) of this definition.
(3) If the residential real property securing a mortgage loan is not located in a State, the loan is not a federally related mortgage loan.
General Rules - Timing Must be delivered by the 3rd business day after receipt of application.
Must be delivered/mailed no later than 7 business days before consummation.
If delivery is via mail, Consumer is presumed to have received the Loan Estimate 3 business days after its placed in mail.
o Must be delivered/mailed no later than 3 business days after receiving the information to revise the Loan Estimate.
o Must be delivered/mailed prior to consumers receipt of Closing Disclosure.
o Consumer must receive revised Loan Estimate no later than 4 business days prior to consummation.
Business day for this purpose is all calendar days except Sundays and certain legal public holidays.
If mailing, must be mailed 6 business days before consummation unless the consumer acknowledges receipt earlier.
o o Must deliver same day if interest rate is locked.
Generally, the creditor is responsible for ensuring that it delivers or places in the mail the Loan Estimate form no later than the third business day after receiving the consumers application The Loan Estimate must also be delivered or placed in the mail no later than the seventh business day before consummation of the transaction.
1026.19(e)(1)(iii)(B) The creditor also is responsible for ensuring that the Loan Estimate and its delivery meet the content, delivery, and timing requirements.
(See 1026.19(e) and 1026.37) Comment 1026.19(e)(1)(iii) Timing.
The disclosures required by 1026.19(e)(1)(i) must be delivered not later than three business days after the creditor receives the consumers application.
For example, if an application is received on Monday, the creditor satisfies this requirement by either hand delivering the disclosures on or before Thursday, or placing them in the mail on or before Thursday, assuming each weekday is a business day 2.
The seven-business-day waiting period begins when the creditor delivers the disclosures or places them in the mail, not when the consumer receives or is considered to have received the disclosures.
For example, if a creditor delivers the early disclosures to the consumer in person or places them in the mail on Monday, June 1, consummation may occur on or after Tuesday, June 9, the seventh business day following delivery or mailing of the early disclosures, because, for the purposes of 1026.19(e)(1)(iii)(B), Saturday is a business day, 3.
The creditor may determine within the three business- day period that the application will not or cannot be approved on the terms requested, such as when a consumers credit score is lower than the minimum score required for the terms the consumer applied for, or the consumer applies for a type or amount of credit that the creditor does not offer.
In that case, or if the consumer withdraws the application within the three business-day period by, for instance, informing the creditor that he intends to take out a loan from another creditor within the three-business-day period, the creditor need not make the disclosures .
If the creditor fails to provide early disclosures and the transaction is later consummated on the terms originally applied for, then the creditor does not comply with 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
If, however, the consumer amends the application because of the creditors unwillingness to approve it on the terms originally applied for, no violation occurs for not providing disclosures based on those original terms.
If consummation occurs within three business days after a creditors receipt of an application for a transaction that is secured by a consumers interest in a timeshare plan, a creditor complies with 1026.19(e)(1)(iii) by providing the disclosures required under 1026.19(f)(1)(i) instead of the disclosures required under 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
7.5. Business Day Definitions Comment 1026.19(e)(1)(iii)-1, 1026.2(a)(6)) Business Day Definition #1: A day on which the creditors offices are open to the public for carrying out substantially all of its business functions.
Business Day Definition #2: All calendar days except Sundays and defined federal legal public holidays.
(Used for counting days to determine receipt of Closing Disclosure and revised Loan Estimate prior to Consummation.)
For purposes of providing the Loan Estimate, a business day is a day on which the creditors offices are open to the public for carrying out substantially all of its business functions.
Note that the term business day is defined differently for other purposes; including counting days to ensure the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure on time.
For these other purposes, business day means all calendar days except Sundays and the legal public holidays specified in 5 U.S.C.
6103(a), which are New Years Day, the Birthday of Martin Luther King, Jr., Washingtons Birthday, Memorial Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veterans Day, Thanksgiving Day, and Christmas Day.
Four Federal legal holidays are identified in 5 U.S.C.
6103(a) by a specific date: New Years Day, January 1; Independence Day, July 4; Veterans Day, November 11; and Christmas Day, December 25.
When one of these holidays (July 4, for example) falls on a Saturday, Federal offices and other entities might observe the holiday on the preceding Friday (July 3).
In cases where the more precise rule applies, the observed holiday (in the example, July 3) is a business day.
Activities that indicate that the creditor is open for substantially all of its business functions include the availability of personnel to make loan disbursements, to open new accounts, and to handle credit transaction inquiries.
Activities that indicate that the creditor is not open for substantially all of its business functions include a retailer's merely accepting credit cards for purchases or a bank's having its customer-service windows open only for limited purposes such as deposits and withdrawals, bill paying, and related services.
Consumer Waiver of the 7 business day waiting period.
1026.19 9e)(1)(v) The consumer may modify or waive the seven-business-day waiting period after receiving the Loan Estimate if the consumer has a bona-fide personal financial emergency that necessitates consummating the credit transaction before the end of the waiting period.
To modify or waive the waiting period, the consumer must give the creditor a dated written statement that describes the emergency, specifically modifies or waives the waiting period, and is signed by all consumers primarily liable on the legal obligation.
The creditor may not provide the consumer with a pre-printed waiver form.
Comment 1026.19 9e)(1)(v) Whether a consumer has a bona fide personal financial emergency is determined by the facts surrounding the consumers individual situation An example of a bona fide personal financial emergency is the imminent sale of the consumers home at foreclosure, where the foreclosure sale will proceed unless loan proceeds are made available to the consumer during the waiting period.
Mortgage Broker Requirements 1026.19(e)(1)(ii) If a mortgage broker receives a consumers application, the mortgage broker may provide the Loan Estimate to the consumer on the creditors behalf.
The provision of a Loan Estimate by a mortgage broker satisfies the creditors obligation to provide a Loan Estimate.
However, any such creditor is expected to maintain communication with mortgage brokers to ensure that the Loan Estimate and its delivery satisfy the requirements described above, and the creditor is legally responsible for any errors or defects.
If a mortgage broker provides the Loan Estimate to a consumer, the mortgage broker must comply with the three year record retention requirement.
When Revisions are allowed 1026.19 (e)(3)(iv) (A-D) Creditors are permitted to provide to the consumer revised Loan Estimates in the following specific circumstances: 1) Changed circumstances that occur after the Loan Estimate is provided to the consumer cause estimated settlement charges to increase more than is permitted under the TILA- RESPA rule ( 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(A)); 2) Changed circumstances that occur after the Loan Estimate is provided to the consumer affect the consumers eligibility for the terms for which the consumer applied or the value of the security for the loan ( 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(B)); 3) Revisions to the credit terms or the settlement are requested by the consumer ( 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(C)); 4) The interest rate was not locked when the Loan Estimate was provided, and locking the rate causes the points or lender credits disclosed on the Loan Estimate to change ( 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(D)); 5) The consumer indicates an intent to proceed with the transaction more than 10 business days after the Loan Estimate was originally provided ( 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(E)).
Creditors should count the number of business days from the date the Loan Estimate was delivered or placed in the mail.
6) The loan is a new construction loan, and settlement is delayed by more than 60 calendar days, if the original Loan Estimate states clearly and conspicuously that at any time prior to 60 calendar days before consummation, the creditor may issue revised disclosures.
A new construction loan is a loan for the purchase of a home that is not yet constructed or in the process of being constructed.
When creditors revise Loan Estimates for these reasons, the revised Loan Estimate may reflect increased charges only to the extent actually justified by the reason for the revision.
Creditors must also retain records demonstrating compliance with the requirements, in order to comply with the record retention requirements of the TILA-RESPA rule.
Changed Circumstances Comment 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(A)-2 and -3 A changed circumstance for purposes of a revised Loan Estimate is: An extraordinary event beyond the control of any interested party or other unexpected event specific to the consumer or transaction.
(Example, war or natural disaster, 3rd party vendor goes out of business.)
Information specific to the consumer or transaction that the creditor relied upon when providing the Loan Estimate and that was inaccurate or changed after the disclosures were provided; or (Example, consumers income is verified and is different than what consumer originally stated in application) New information specific to the consumer or transaction that the creditor did not rely on when providing the Loan Estimate.
( 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(A)(3)) (Example, creditor relies upon value of property in disclosure but during underwriting a neighbor of the seller files a claim contesting the boundary of the property to be sold) Borrower Requested Changes NOTE: Creditors are not required to collect all six pieces of information constituting the consumers applicationi.e., the consumers name, monthly income, social security number to obtain a credit report, the property address, an estimate of the value of the property, or the mortgage loan amount soughtprior to issuing the Loan Estimate.
However, creditors are presumed to have collected this information prior to providing the Loan Estimate and may not later collect it and claim a changed circumstance.
For example, if a creditor provides a Loan Estimate prior to receiving the property address from the consumer, the creditor cannot subsequently claim that the receipt of the property address is a changed circumstance.
Changed circumstance for third party charges that increase.
(Comment 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(A) 1(ii) Charges subject to the ten percent tolerance category.
Assume a creditor provides a $400 estimate of title fees, which are included in the category of fees which may not increase by more than 10 percent.
An unreleased lien is discovered and the title company must perform additional work to release the lien.
However, the additional costs amount to only a five percent increase over the sum of all fees included in the category of fees which may not increase by more than 10 percent.
A changed circumstance has occurred (i.e., new information), but the sum of all costs subject to the 10 percent tolerance category has not increased by more than 10 percent.
Section 1026.19(e)(3)(iv) does not prohibit the creditor from issuing revised disclosures, but if the creditor issues revised disclosures in this scenario, when the disclosures required by 1026.19(f)(1)(i) are delivered, the actual title fees of $500 may not be compared to the revised title fees of $500; they must be compared to the originally estimated title fees of $400 because the changed circumstance did not cause the sum of all costs subject to the 10 percent tolerance category to increase by more than 10 percent.
1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(B) and Comment 19(e)(3)(iv)(B)-1 A creditor also may provide and use a revised Loan Estimate if a changed circumstance affected the consumers creditworthiness or the value of the security for the loan, and resulted in the consumer being ineligible for an estimated loan term previously disclosed.
For example: The creditor relied on the consumers representation to the creditor of a $90,000 annual income, but underwriting determines that the consumers annual income is only $80,000.
There are two co-applicants applying for a mortgage loan and the creditor relied on a combined income when providing the Loan Estimate, but one applicant subsequently becomes unemployed.
Rate Locks 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(D) If the interest rate for the loan was not locked when the Loan Estimate was provided and, upon being locked at some later time, points or lender credits for the mortgage loan change, the creditor is required to provide a revised Loan Estimate no later than three business days after the date the interest rate is locked, and may use the revised Loan Estimate to compare to points and lender credits charged.
The revised Loan Estimate must reflect the revised interest rate as well as any revisions to the points disclosed on the Loan Estimate pursuant to 1026.37(f)(1), lender credits, and any other interest rate dependent charges and terms that have changed due to the new interest rate.
Time Requirements for Revisions 1026.19(e)(4)(i) and (ii) & Comment 19(e)(4)(i) and (ii) General Rules Creditor must deliver or place in the mail the revised Loan Estimate to the consumer no later than three business days after receiving the information sufficient to establish that one of the reasons for the revision The revised Loan Estimate may not be provided on or after the date it provides the Closing Disclosure.
o If a changed circumstance occurs after the first Closing Disclosure has been provided to the consumer (i.e., within the three-business-day waiting period before consummation), the creditor may use revised charges on the Closing Disclosure provided to the consumer at consummation, and compare those amounts to the amounts charged for purposes of determining good faith and tolerance.
The revised Loan Estimate must be received by the Consumer no later than 4 business days prior to consummation.
o If a changed circumstance occurs between the 4th and 3rd business day prior to consummation, the creditor may not rely on a revised loan estimate but rather provide the consumer with a Closing Disclosure reflecting any revised changes resulting from the changed circumstance.
If the revised Loan Estimate is mailed and relying upon the 3 business day mailbox rule, the creditor would need to mail the Loan Estimate no later than seven business days before consummation of the transaction to allow 3 business days for receipt.
The seventh business day begins with the creditor delivers the loan estimate or places it in the mail.
However, if the creditor has evidence that the consumer received the revised Loan Estimate earlier than three business days after it is mailed or delivered, it may rely on that evidence and consider it to be received on that date.
Business Day The standard business day definition applies for providing the revised loan estimate.
day on which the creditors offices are open to the public for carrying out substantially all of its business functions) However, for purposes of the four-business-day period prior to consummation, business day means all calendar days except Sundays and legal public holidays.
The unaffiliated pest inspection company informs the creditor on Monday that the subject property contains evidence of termite damage, requiring a further inspection, the cost of which will cause an increase in estimated settlement charges by more than 10 percent.
The creditor must provide revised disclosures by Thursday.
Assume a creditor receives information on Monday that, because of a changed circumstance the title fees will increase by an amount totaling six percent of the originally estimated settlement charges.
Also, the creditor had received information three weeks before that, because of a changed circumstance, the pest inspection fees increased by five percent of the originally estimated settlement charges.
Thus, on Monday, the creditor has received sufficient information to establish a valid reason for revision and must provide revised disclosures reflecting the 11 percent increase by Thursday.
The creditor receives the appraisal report, which indicates that the value of the home is significantly lower than expected.
However, the creditor has reason to doubt the validity of the appraisal report.
A reason for revision has not been established because the creditor reasonably believes that the appraisal report is incorrect.
The creditor then chooses to send a different appraiser for a second opinion, but the second appraiser returns a similar report.
At this point, the creditor has received information sufficient to establish that a reason for revision has, in fact, occurred, and must provide corrected disclosures within three business days of receiving the second appraisal report.
In this example,, the creditor must maintain records documenting the creditors doubts regarding the validity of the appraisal to demonstrate that the reason for revision did not occur upon receipt of the first appraisal report.
Comment 1026.19(e)(4) (ii) Relationship to the Closing Disclosure Revised disclosures may not be delivered at the same time as the Closing Disclosure.
Section 1026.19(e)(4)(ii) prohibits a creditor from providing a revised version of the Closing Disclosure on or after the date on which the creditor provides the Closing Disclosure Section 1026.19(e)(4)(ii) also requires that the consumer must receive a revised version of the Loan Estimate no later than four business days prior to consummation, and provides that if the revised version of the Loan Estimate is not provided to the consumer in person, the consumer is considered to have received the revised version of the disclosures three business days after the creditor delivers or places in the mail the revised version of the disclosures.
If there are less than four business days between the time the revised version of the disclosures is required to be provided and consummation, creditors comply with the requirements if the revised disclosures are reflected in the disclosures required by 1026.19(f)(1)(i).
If the creditor is scheduled to meet with the consumer and provide the disclosures on Wednesday, and the APR becomes inaccurate on Tuesday, the creditor complies with the requirements by providing the disclosures required reflecting the revised APR on Wednesday.
However, the creditor does not comply with the requirements if it provided both a revised version of the disclosures required reflecting the revised APR on Wednesday, and also provides the Closing Disclosure on Wednesday.
If the creditor is scheduled to email the Closing Disclosure to the consumer on Wednesday, and the consumer requests a change to the loan that would result in a revised Loan Estimate on Tuesday, the creditor complies with the requirements of 1026.19(e)(4) by providing the Closing Disclosure reflecting the consumer-requested changes on Wednesday.
However, the creditor does not comply if it provides both the revised Loan Estimate and the Closing Disclosure on Wednesday.
Limitations on Fees and Good Faith Test Comment 1026.17(c)(2)(i)-1 Creditors are required to act in good faith and exercise due diligence in obtaining information necessary to complete the Loan Estimate.
Normally creditors may rely on the representations of other parties in obtaining information.
However, there may be some information that is unknown (i.e., not reasonably available to the creditor at the time the Loan Estimate is made).
In these instances, the creditor may use estimates even though it knows that more precise information will be available by the point of consummation.
(Comment 1026.17(c)(2)(i)-1 For example, the creditor might look to the consumer for the time of consummation, to insurance companies for the cost of insurance, or to realtors for taxes and escrow fees.
The creditor may utilize estimates in making disclosures even though the creditor knows that more precise information will be available by the point of consummation.
Good Faith Test 1026.19(e)(3); Comment 19(e)(3)(iii)-1 through -3 Creditors are responsible for ensuring that the figures stated in the Loan Estimate are made in good faith and consistent with the best information reasonably available to the creditor at the time they are disclosed.
Whether or not a Loan Estimate was made in good faith is determined by calculating the difference between the estimated charges originally provided in the Loan Estimate and the actual charges paid by or imposed on the consumer in the Closing Disclosure.
Comment 1026.19(e)(3)(i) and (ii) Generally, if the charge paid by or imposed on the consumer exceeds the amount originally disclosed on the Loan Estimate it is not in good faith, regardless of whether the creditor later discovers a technical error, miscalculation, or underestimation of a charge.
However, a Loan Estimate is considered to be in good faith if the creditor charges the consumer less than the amount disclosed on the Loan Estimate, without regard to any tolerance limitations.
Use of Estimates 1026.17(c)(2)(i) Creditors are required to act in good faith and exercise due diligence in obtaining information necessary to complete the Loan Estimate.
Normally creditors may rely on the representations of other parties in obtaining information.
However, there may be some information that is unknown (i.e., not reasonably available to the creditor at the time the Loan Estimate is made).
In these instances, the creditor may use estimates even though it knows that more precise information will be available by the point of consummation.
However, new disclosures may be required under 1026.17(c) or 1026.19.
When estimated figures are used, they must be designated as such on the Loan Estimate.
No Limitations 1026.19 (e) (3)(iii) These charges are: Prepaid interest; property insurance premiums; amounts placed into an escrow, impound, reserve or similar account.
For services required by the creditor if the creditor permits the consumer to shop and the consumer selects a third-party service provider not on the creditors written list of service providers.
Charges paid to third-party service providers for services not required by the creditor (may be paid to affiliates of the creditor).
However, creditors may only charge consumers more than the amount disclosed when the original estimated charge, or lack of an estimated charge for a particular service, was based on the best information reasonably available to the creditor at the time the disclosure was provided.
Comment 1026.19(e)(3)(iii) Variations permitted for certain charges.
For example, if the creditor requires homeowners insurance but fails to include a homeowners insurance premium on the estimates, then the creditors failure to disclose does not comply with 1026.19(e)(3)(iii).
However, if the creditor does not require flood insurance and the subject property is located in an area where floods frequently occur, but not specifically located in a zone where flood insurance is required, failure to include flood insurance on the original estimates provided pursuant to 1026.19(e)(1)(i) does not constitute a lack of good faith under 1026.19(e)(3)(iii).
Or, if the creditor knows that the loan must close on the 15th of the month but estimates prepaid interest to be paid from the 30th of that month, then the under-disclosure does not comply with 1026.19(e)(3)(iii) 8.4.
Zero Increase 1026.19 (e) 3(ii) Creditors are not permitted to charge consumers more than the amount disclosed on the Loan Estimate for the following fees: Fees paid to the creditor, mortgage broker, or an affiliate of either; Fees paid to an unaffiliated party if the creditor did not permit the consumer to shop for a third party service provider for a settlement service; and Transfer Taxes.
Refunds 1026.19(e)(3)(i)) ( 1026.19(f)(2)(v) For charges subject to zero tolerance, any amount charged beyond the amount disclosed on the Loan Estimate must be refunded to the consumer within 60 days of consummation.
Affiliate Definition 1026.32(b)(5) The term affiliate is given the same meaning it has for purposes of determining Ability-to- Repay and HOEPA coverage: any company that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another company, as set forth in the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956.
12 U.S.C 1841 (a) (2) (2) Any company has control over a bank or over any company if-- (A) the company directly or indirectly or acting through one or more other persons owns, controls, or has power to vote 25 per centum or more of any class of voting securities of the bank or company; (B) the company controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors or trustees of the bank or company; or (C) the Board determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the company directly or indirectly exercises a controlling influence over the management or policies of the bank or company.
Charges paid to Creditor or Broker Comment 1026.19(e)(3)(i)-3) A charge is paid to the creditor, mortgage broker, or an affiliate of either if it is retained by that person or entity.
A charge is not paid to one of these entities when it receives money but passes it on to an unaffiliated third party.
For purposes of 1026.19(e), a fee is not considered paid to a person if the person does not retain the fee.
For example, if a consumer pays the creditor transfer taxes and recording fees at the real estate closing and the creditor subsequently uses those funds to pay the county that imposed these charges, then the transfer taxes and recording fees are not paid to the creditor for purposes of 1026.19(e).
Similarly, if a consumer pays the creditor an appraisal fee in advance of the real estate closing and the creditor subsequently uses those funds to pay another party for an appraisal, then the appraisal fee is not paid to the creditor for the purposes of 1026.19(e).
A fee is also not considered paid to a person, for purposes of 1026.19(e), if the person retains the fee as reimbursement for an amount it has already paid to another party.
If a creditor pays for an appraisal in advance of the real estate closing and the consumer pays the creditor an appraisal fee at the real estate closing, then the fee is not paid to the creditor for the purposes of 1026.19(e), even though the creditor retains the fee, because the payment is a reimbursement for an amount already paid.
The disclosure of lender credits, is required by 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
Lender credits, represents the sum of non-specific lender credits and specific lender credits.
Non-specific lender credits are generalized payments from the creditor to the consumer that do not pay for a particular fee on the disclosures provided pursuant to 1026.19(e)(1).
Specific lender credits are specific payments, such as a credit, rebate, or reimbursement, from a creditor to the consumer to pay for a specific fee.
The actual total amount of lender credits, whether specific or nonspecific, provided by the creditor that is less than the estimated lender credits and disclosed is an increased charge to the consumer for purposes of determining good faith.
For example, if the credit or discloses a $750 estimate for lender credits, but only $500 of lender credits is actually provided to the consumer, the creditor has not complied with 1026.19(e)(3)(i) because the actual amount of lender credits provided is less than the estimated lender credits disclosed , and is therefore, an increased charge to the consumer for purposes of determining good faith under 1026.19(e)(3)(i).
However, if the creditor discloses a $750 estimate for lender credits identified in 1026.37(g)(6)(ii) to cover the cost of a $750 appraisal fee, and the appraisal fee subsequently increases by $150, and the creditor increases the amount of the lender credit by $150 to pay for the increase, the credit is not being revised in a way that violates the requirements of 1026.19(e)(3)(i) because, although the credit increased from the amount disclosed, the amount paid by the consumer did not.
However, if the creditor discloses a $750 estimate for lender credits to cover the cost of a $750 appraisal fee, but subsequently reduces the credit by $50 because the appraisal fee decreased by $50, then the requirements of 1026.19(e)(3)(i) have been violated because, although the amount of the appraisal fee decreased, the amount of the lender credit decreased.
See also 1026.19(e)(3)(iv)(D) and comment 19(e)(3)(iv)(D)-1 for a discussion of lender credits in the context of interest rate dependent charges.
For purposes of conducting the good faith analysis required for lender credits, the total amount of lender credits, whether specific or non-specific, actually provided to the consumer is compared to the amount of the lender credits identified in 1026.37(g)(6)(ii).
The total amount of lender credits actually provided to the consumer is determined by aggregating the amount of the lender credits identified in 1026.38(h)(3) with the amounts paid by the creditor that are attributable to a specific loan cost or other cost, disclosed pursuant to 1026.38(f) and (g).
Ten % Increase 1026.19 (e)(3)(ii) Charges for third-party services and recording fees paid by or imposed on the consumer are grouped together and subject to a 10% cumulative tolerance.
This means the creditor may charge the consumer more than the amount disclosed on the Loan Estimate for any of these charges so long as the total sum of the charges added together does not exceed the sum of all such charges disclosed on the Loan Estimate by more than 10%.
These charges are: Recording fees Charges for third-party services where: The charge is not paid to the creditor or the creditors affiliate The consumer is permitted by the creditor to shop for the third-party service, and the consumer selects a third-party service provider on the creditors written list of service providers.
To the extent owners title insurance is not required by the creditor and is disclosed as an optional service, under the rule the insurance is not subject to any percentage tolerance limitation, even if paid to an affiliate of the creditor.
Exceeding 10% 1026.19(f)(2)(v)) ( 1026.19(e)(3)(ii) For charges subject to a 10% cumulative tolerance, to the extent the total sum of the charges added together exceeds the sum of all such charges disclosed on the Loan Estimate by more than 10%, the difference must be refunded to the consumer.
Service Provider not on Creditors list 2016.19(e)(3)(iii) When a creditor allows a consumer to shop for a third-party service and the consumer chooses a service provider not identified on the creditors list, the charge is not subject to a tolerance limitation.
Calculating the Total Aggregate Costs/ Estimated Services Not Actually Performed.
Comment 2016.19 (e)(3)(ii) -5 Limited increases permitted for certain charges Calculating the aggregate amount of estimated charges.
In calculating the aggregate amount of estimated charges for purposes of conducting the good faith analysis , the aggregate amount of estimated charges must reflect charges for services that are actually performed.
For example, assume that the creditor included a $100 estimated fee for a pest inspection in the disclosures provided, and the fee is included in the category of charges subject to 1026.19(e)(3)(ii), but a pest inspection was not obtained in connection with the transaction, then for purposes of the good faith analysis required, the sum of all charges paid by or imposed on the consumer is compared to the sum of all such charges disclosed, minus the $100 estimated pest inspection fee.
Creditor may charge more than estimated Comment 2016.19 (e)(3)(ii)-2 A creditor may charge more than 10% in excess of an individual estimated charge in this category, so long as the sum of all charges is still with 10% cumulative tolerance.
Creditor may charge for a fee that was not estimated.
Comment 2016.19 (e) (3) (ii)-2 Creditors also are provided flexibility in disclosing individual fees by the focus on the aggregate amount of all charges.
A creditor may charge a consumer for a fee that would fall under the 10% cumulative tolerance but was not included on the Loan Estimate so long as the sum of all charges in this category paid does not exceed the sum of all estimated charges by more than 10%.
Shopping for Service Providers 1026.19(e)(1)(vi)(C) If the consumer is permitted to shop for a settlement service, the creditor must provide the consumer with a written list of services for which the consumer can shop.
This written list of providers is separate from the Loan Estimate, but must be provided within the same time framethat is, it must be provided to the consumer no later than three business days after the creditor receives the consumers applicationand the list must: Identify at least one available settlement service provider for each service; and State that the consumer may choose a different provider of that service.
( 1026.19(e)(3)(ii)(C) and (e)(1)(vi)(C)) The settlement service providers identified on the written list must correspond to the settlement services for which the consumer can shop as disclosed on the Loan Estimate.
See form H-27(A) of appendix H to Regulation Z for a model list.
The creditor may also identify on the written list of providers those services for which the consumer is not permitted to shop, as long as those services are clearly and conspicuously distinguished from those services for which the consumer is permitted to shop.
See form H- 27(C) of appendix H to Regulation Z for a sample of the inclusion of this information.
The creditor may include a statement on the written list that the listing of a settlement service provider does not constitute an endorsement of that service provider.
The creditor may also identify on the written list providers of services for which the consumer is not permitted to shop, provided that the creditor clearly and conspicuously distinguishes those services from the services for which the consumer is permitted to shop.
This may be accomplished by placing the services under different headings.
For example, if the list provided identifies providers of pest inspections and surveys, but the consumer may select a provider, other than those identified on the list, for only the survey, then the list must specifically inform the consumer that the consumer is permitted to select a provider, other than a provider identified on the list, for only the survey.
Section 1026.19 does not prohibit creditors from including affiliates on the written list.
However, a creditor that includes affiliates on the written list must also comply with 12 CFR 1024.15.
Furthermore, the written list is a referral under 12 CFR 1024.14(f).
General Requirements 1026.19(f) and 1026.38 For loans that require a Loan Estimate and that proceed to closing, creditors must provide a new final disclosure reflecting the actual terms of the transaction called the Closing Disclosure.
The form integrates and replaces the existing HUD-1 and the final TIL disclosure for these transactions.
The creditor is generally required to ensure that the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure no later than three business days before consummation of the loan.
The Closing Disclosure generally must contain the actual terms and costs of the transaction.
Creditors may estimate disclosures using the best information reasonably available when the actual term or cost is not reasonably available to the creditor at the time the disclosure is made.
However, creditors must act in good faith and use due diligence in obtaining the information.
The creditor normally may rely on the representations of other parties in obtaining the information, including, for example, the settlement agent.
The creditor is required to provide corrected disclosures containing the actual terms of the transaction at or before consummation.
The Closing Disclosure must be in writing and contain the information prescribed in 1026.38.
The creditor must disclose only the specific information set forth in 1026.38(a) through (s), as shown in the Bureaus form in appendix H-25.
If the actual terms or costs of the transaction change prior to consummation, the creditor must provide a corrected disclosure that contains the actual terms of the transaction and complies with the other requirements of 1026.19(f), including the timing requirements, and requirements for providing corrected disclosures due to subsequent changes.
If the creditor provides a corrected disclosure, it may also be required to provide the consumer with an additional three-business- day waiting period prior to consummation.
Requirement to Use Closing Disclosure Form 1026.38(t)(3)(i) and (ii) For any loans subject to the TILA-RESPA rule that are federally related mortgage loans subject to RESPA (which will include most mortgages), form H-25 is a standard form, meaning creditors must use the form H-25.
For other transactions subject to the TILA-RESPA rule that are not federally related mortgage loans, form H-25 is a model form, meaning creditors are not strictly required to use form H-25, but the disclosures, if used, must contain the exact same information and be made with headings, content, and format substantially similar to form H-25.
Consummation 1026.2(a)(13)) and Comment 2(a)(13)-1 Consummation may commonly occur at the same time as closing or settlement, but it is a legally distinct event.
Consummation occurs when the consumer becomes contractually obligated to the creditor on the loan, not, for example, when the consumer becomes contractually obligated to a seller on a real estate transaction.
The point in time when a consumer becomes contractually obligated to the creditor on the loan depends on applicable State law.
Creditors and settlement agents should verify the applicable State laws to determine when consummation will occur, and make sure delivery of the Closing Disclosure occurs at least three business days before this event.
When a contractual obligation on the consumer's part is created is a matter to be determined under applicable law; Regulation Z does not make this determination.
A contractual commitment agreement, for example, that under applicable law binds the consumer to the credit terms would be consummation.
Consummation, however, does not occur merely because the consumer has made some financial investment in the transaction (for example, by paying a nonrefundable fee) unless, of course, applicable law holds otherwise.
Timing and Waiver 1026.19(f)(1)(ii)(A) Creditors must ensure that the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure at least three business days prior to consummation.
The term business day means all calendar days except Sundays and legal public holidays.
The settlement agent must provide the seller its copy of the Closing Disclosure no later than the day of consummation.
For timeshare transactions, the creditor must ensure that the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure no later than consummation.
( 1026.19(f)(1)(ii)(B)) Waivers of 3 Days 1026.19(f)(1)(iv) Like the seven-business-day waiting period after receiving the Loan Estimate consumers may waive or modify the three-business-day waiting period when: The extension of credit is needed to meet a bona fide personal financial emergency.
The consumer has received the Closing Disclosure; and The consumer gives the creditor a dated written statement that describes the emergency, specifically modifies or waives the waiting period, and bears the signature of all consumers who are primarily liable on the legal obligation.
( 1026.19(f)(1)(iv)) The creditor is prohibited from providing the consumer with a pre-printed waiver form.
Corrected Disclosures ( 1026.19(f)(2)(i) and (ii)) The three-business-day waiting period requirement applies to a corrected Closing Disclosure that is provided when there are: Changes to the loans APR; Changes to the loan product; or The addition of a prepayment penalty.
If other types of changes occur, creditors must ensure that the consumer receives a corrected Closing Disclosure at or before consummation.
Delivery Method 1026.19(f)(1)(ii)(A)) To ensure the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure on time, creditors must arrange for delivery as follows: By providing it to the consumer in person.
By mailing, or by other delivery methods, including email.
Creditors may use electronic delivery methods subject to compliance with the consumer consent and other applicable provisions of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C.
( 1026.38(t)(3)(iii)) 9.4.3. Who Delivers to Consumer?
1026.1919(f)(1)(v) Creditors may contract with settlement agents to have the settlement agent provide the Closing Disclosure to consumers on the creditors behalf.
Creditors and settlement agents also may agree to divide responsibility with regard to completing the Closing Disclosure, with the settlement agent assuming responsibility to complete some or all the Closing Disclosure.
Comment 1026.19(f)(1)(v)-3 Creditor responsibilities.
If a settlement agent provides disclosures in the creditors place, the creditor remains responsible for ensuring that the requirements of 1026.19(f) have been satisfied.
For example, if the settlement agent assumes the responsibility for providing all of the disclosures, the creditor does not comply if the settlement agent does not provide these disclosures at all, or if the consumer receives the disclosures later than three business days before consummation.
Also, the creditor does not satisfy the requirements of 1026.19(f) if it provides duplicative disclosures.
For example, a creditor does not satisfy its obligation by issuing disclosures that mirror ones already issued by the settlement agent for the purpose of demonstrating that the consumer received timely disclosures.
The creditor is expected to maintain communication with the settlement agent to ensure that the settlement agent is acting in place of the creditor.
Comment 1026.19(f)(1)(v)-4 For example, the creditor and the settlement agent comply with the requirements of 1026.19(f)(1)(i) if the settlement agent agrees to complete only the portion of the disclosures related to closing costs for taxes, title fees, and insurance premiums, and the creditor agrees to complete the remainder of the disclosures, and either the settlement agent or the creditor provides the consumer with one single disclosure form containing all of the information required to be disclosed , in accordance with the other requirements in 1026.19(f), such as requirements related to timing and delivery.
Creditor must maintain communication with the settlement agent to ensure that the Closing Disclosure and its delivery satisfy the requirements described above, and the creditor is legally responsible for any errors or defects.
( 1026.19(f)(1)(v) and Comment 19(f)(1)(v)-3) 9.4.4. Who delivers to seller?
1026.19(f)(4)(i)) and Comment 19(f)(4)(i)-1 The settlement agent is required to provide the seller with the Closing Disclosure reflecting the actual terms of the sellers transaction.
The settlement agent may comply with this requirement by providing the seller with a copy of the Closing Disclosure provided to the consumer (buyer) if it also contains information relating to the sellers transaction.
The settlement agent may also provide the seller with a separate disclosure, including only the information applicable to the sellers transaction from the Closing Disclosure (See form H-25(I) of appendix H to Regulation Z for a model form).
However, if the sellers disclosure is provided in a separate document, the settlement agent has to provide the creditor with a copy of the disclosure provided to the seller.
Delivery to Multiple Consumers In rescindable transactions, the Closing Disclosure must be given separately to each consumer who has the right to rescind under TILA (see 1026.23), although the disclosures required for adjustable rate mortgages need only be provided to the consumer who expresses an interest in a variable-rate loan program.
In transactions that arent rescindable, the Closing Disclosure may be provided to any consumer with primary liability on the obligation.
Implementation tip: It is acceptable if some creditors desire that each obligor to a transaction receive a Closing Disclosure to obtain a signature of the customary recitals or certifications attached to the disclosures.
Revisions to Closing Disclosure 1026.19(f)(2))(i-iii) Creditors must redisclose terms or costs on the Closing Disclosure if certain changes occur to the transaction after the Closing Disclosure was first provided that cause the disclosures to become inaccurate.
There are three categories of changes that require a corrected Closing Disclosure containing all changed terms.
Changes that occur before consummation that require a new three-business-day waiting period.
Changes that occur before consummation and do not require a new three-business- day waiting period.
Changes that require a new three day waiting period.
1026.19(f)(2)(ii) and Comment 19(f)(2)(ii)-1 If one of the following occurs after delivery of the Closing Disclosure and before consummation, the creditor must provide a corrected Closing Disclosure containing all changed terms and ensure that the consumer receives it no later than three business days before consummation.
This period may be waived if the consumer is facing a bona fide personal financial emergency.
If the annual percentage rate (APR) previously disclosed becomes inaccurate, the creditor must provide a corrected Closing Disclosure with the corrected APR disclosure and all other terms that have changed.
The APRs accuracy is determined according to 1026.22.
Comment 1026.19(f)(2)(ii)(i) i. ExampleAssume consummation is scheduled for Thursday, June 11 and the disclosure for a regular mortgage transaction received by the consumer on Monday, June 8 under discloses an annual percentage rate of 7.00 %: A.
On Thursday, June 11, the annual percentage rate will be 7.10 percent.
The creditor is not required to delay consummation to provide corrected disclosures because the annual percentage rate is accurate pursuant to 1026.22, but the creditor is required to provide corrected disclosures, including any other changed terms, so that the consumer receives them on or before Thursday, June 11.
On Thursday, June 11, the annual percentage rate will be 7.15 percent and corrected disclosures were not received by the consumer on or before Monday, June 8 because the annual percentage rate is inaccurate pursuant to 1026.22.
The creditor is required to delay consummation and provide corrected disclosures, including any other changed terms, so that the consumer receives them at least three business days before consummation.
If the loan product previously disclosed becomes inaccurate, the creditor must provide a corrected Closing Disclosure with the corrected loan product and all other terms that have changes.
Assume consummation is scheduled for Thursday, June 11 and the disclosures provided disclose a product required to be disclosed as a Fixed Rate that contains no features that may change the periodic payment.
On Thursday, June 11, the loan product required to be disclosed changes to a 5/1 Adjustable Rate.
The creditor is required to provide corrected disclosures and delay consummation until the consumer has received the corrected disclosures provided under 1026.19(f)(1)(i) reflecting the change in the product disclosure, and any other changed terms, at least three business days before consummation.
If, after the corrected disclosures in this example are provided, the loan product subsequently changes before consummation to a 3/1 Adjustable Rate, the creditor is required to provide additional corrected disclosures and again delay consummation until the consumer has received the corrected disclosures provided under 1026.19(f)(1)(i) reflecting the change in the product disclosure, and any other changed terms, at least three business days before consummation.
On Thursday, June 11, the loan product required to be disclosed has changed to a Fixed Rate with a Negative Amortization feature.
The creditor is required to provide corrected disclosures and delay consummation until the consumer has received the corrected disclosures provided under 1026.19(f)(1)(i) reflecting the change in the product disclosure, and any other changed terms, at least three business days before consummation.
If a prepayment penalty is added to the transaction, the creditor must provide a corrected Closing Disclosure with the prepayment penalty provision disclosed an all other terms that have changed.
Comment 1026.19(f)(2)(ii)-1(iii) Exampleprepayment penalty is added.
Assume consummation is scheduled for Thursday, June 11 and the disclosure provided under 1026.19(f)(1)(i) did not disclose a prepayment penalty.
On Wednesday, June 10, a prepayment penalty is added to the transaction such that the disclosure required by 1026.38(b) becomes inaccurate.
The creditor is required to provide corrected disclosures and delay consummation until the consumer has received the corrected disclosures provided under 1026.19(f)(1)(i) reflecting the change in the disclosure of the loan terms, and any other changed terms, at least three business days before consummation.
If, after the revised disclosures in this example are provided but before consummation, the prepayment penalty is removed such that the description of the prepayment penalty again becomes inaccurate, and no other changes to the transaction occur, the creditor is required to provide corrected disclosures so that the consumer receives them at or before consummation under 1026.19(f)(2)(i), but the creditor is not required to delay consummation because 1026.19(f)(2)(ii)(C) applies only when a prepayment penalty is added.
1026.19(f)(2)(i); For any other changes before consummation that do not fall under the three categories above (i.e., related to the APR, loan product, or the addition of a prepayment penalty), the creditor still must provide a corrected Closing Disclosure with any terms or costs that have changed and ensure that the consumer receives it.
For these changes, there is no additional three-business-day waiting period required.
The creditor must ensure only that the consumer receives the revised Closing Disclosure at or before consummation.
Assume consummation is scheduled for Thursday, the consumer received the Closing Disclosure on Monday, and a walk-through inspection occurs on Wednesday morning.
During the walk-through the consumer discovers damage to the dishwasher.
The seller agrees to credit the consumer $500 towards a new dishwasher.
The creditor complies with the requirements of if the creditor provides corrected disclosures so that the consumer receives them at or before consummation on Thursday.
Assume consummation is scheduled for Friday and on Monday morning the creditor sends the disclosures via overnight delivery to the consumer, ensuring that the consumer receives the disclosures on Tuesday.
On Monday night, the seller agrees to sell certain household furnishings to the consumer for an additional $1,000, to be paid at the real estate closing, and the consumer immediately informs the creditor of the change.
The creditor must provide corrected disclosures so that the consumer receives them at or before consummation.
The creditor does not violate 1026.19(f) because the change to the transaction resulting from negotiations between the seller and consumer occurred after the creditor provided the final disclosures, regardless of the fact that the change occurred before the consumer had received the final disclosures.
Assume consummation is scheduled for Thursday, the consumer received the disclosures required on Monday, and a walk-through inspection occurs on Wednesday morning.
As a result of consumer and seller negotiations, the total amount due from the buyer increases by $500.
Also on Wednesday, the creditor discovers that the homeowners insurance premium that was disclosed as $800 is actually $850.
The new $500 amount due and the $50 insurance premium understatements are not violations of 1026.19(f)(1)(i), and the creditor complies with 1026.19(f)(1)(i) by providing corrected disclosures reflecting the $550 increase so that the consumer receives them at or before consummation, pursuant to 1026.19(f)(2)(ii).
Consumer Right to Inspect 1026.19(f)(2)(i) A consumer has the right to inspect the Closing Disclosure during the business day before consummation.
If a consumer asks to inspect the Closing Disclosure the business day before consummation, the Closing Disclosure presented to the consumer must reflect any adjustments to the costs or terms that are known to the creditor at the time the consumer inspects it.
Creditors may arrange for settlement agents to permit consumers to inspect the Closing Disclosure.
( 1026.19(f)(1)(v) and Comment 19(f)(2)(i)-2) 9.5.4.
Post Consummation Revisions 1026.19(f)(2)(i)-2) When a post-consummation event requires a corrected Closing Disclosure, the creditor must deliver or place in the mail a corrected Closing Disclosure not later than 30 calendar days after receiving information sufficient to establish that such an event has occurred.
( 1026.19(f)(2)(iii); An example of a post-consummation event that would require a new Closing Disclosure is a discovery that a recording fee paid by the consumer is different from the amount that was disclosed on the Closing Disclosure.
However, other post- consummation events that are not related to settlement, such as tax increases, do not require a revised Closing Disclosure.
Seller Changes Also, settlement agents must provide a revised Closing Disclosure if an event related to the settlement occurs during the 30-day period after consummation that causes the Closing Disclosure to become inaccurate and results in a change to an amount actually paid by the seller from what was previously disclosed.
19(f)(2)(iii) Changes due to events occurring after consummation.
Under 1026.19(f)(2)(iii), if during the 30-day period following consummation, an event in connection with the settlement of the transaction occurs that causes the disclosures to become inaccurate, and such inaccuracy results in a change to an amount actually paid by the consumer from that amount disclosed, the creditor shall deliver or place in the mail corrected disclosures not later than 30 days after receiving information sufficient to establish that such event has occurred.
The following examples illustrate this requirement.
(See also comment 19(e)(4)(i)-1 for further guidance on when sufficient information has been received to establish an event has occurred.)
Assume consummation occurs on a Monday and the security instrument is recorded on Tuesday, the day after consummation.
If the creditor learns on Tuesday that the fee charged by the recorders office differs from that previously disclosed, and the changed fee results in a change in the amount actually paid by the consumer, the creditor complies with 1026.19(f)(1)(i) and (f)(2)(iii) by revising the disclosures accordingly and delivering or placing them in the mail no later than 30 days after Tuesday.
Assume consummation occurs on a Tuesday, October 1 and the security instrument is not recorded until 15 days after October 1 on Thursday, October 16.
The creditor learns on Monday, November 4 that the transfer taxes owed to the State differ from those previously disclosed, resulting in an increase in the amount actually paid by the consumer.
The creditor complies with 1026.19(f)(1)(i) and 1026.19(f)(2)(iii) by revising the disclosures accordingly and delivering or placing them in the mail no later than 30 days after Monday, November 4.
Assume further that the increase in transfer taxes paid by the consumer also exceeds the amount originally disclosed above the limitations prescribed by 1026.19(e)(3)(i).
Pursuant to 1026.19(f)(2)(v), the creditor does not violate 1026.19(e)(1)(i) if the creditor refunds the excess to the consumer no later than 60 days after consummation, and the creditor does not violate 1026.19(f)(1)(i) if the creditor delivers disclosures corrected to reflect the refund of such excess no later than 60 days after consummation.
The creditor satisfies these requirements under 1026.19(f)(2)(v) if it revises the disclosures accordingly and delivers or places them in the mail by November 30. iii.
Assume consummation occurs on a Monday and the security instrument is recorded on Tuesday, the day after consummation.
During the recording process on Tuesday the settlement agent and the creditor discover that the property is subject to an unpaid $500 nuisance abatement assessment, which was not disclosed , and learns that pursuant to an agreement with the seller, the $500 assessment will be paid by the seller rather than the consumer.
Because the $500 assessment does not result in a change to an amount actually paid by the consumer, the creditor is not required to provide a corrected disclosure .
However, the assessment will result in a change to an amount actually paid by the seller from the amount disclosed.
The settlement agent must deliver or place in the mail corrected disclosures to the seller no later than 30 days after Tuesday and provide a copy to the creditor pursuant iv.
Assume consummation occurs on a Monday and the security instrument is recorded on Tuesday, the day after consummation.
Assume further that ten days after consummation the municipality in which the property is located raises property tax rates effective after the date on which settlement concludes.
Section 1026.19(f)(2)(iii) does not require the creditor to provide the consumer with corrected disclosures because the increase in property tax rates is not in connection with the settlement of the transaction.
Clerical Errors 1026.19(f)(2)(iv); Comment 19(f)(2)(iv)-1 Yes.
Creditors also must provide a revised Closing Disclosure to correct non-numerical clerical errors and document refunds for tolerance violations no later than 60 calendar days after consummation.
An error is clerical if it does not affect a numerical disclosure and does not affect the timing, delivery, or other requirements imposed by 1026.19(e) or (f).
For example: If the Closing Disclosure identifies the incorrect settlement service provider as the recipient of a payment, the error would be considered clerical because it is non- numerical and does not affect any of the delivery requirements.
However, if the Closing Disclosure lists the wrong property address, which affects the delivery requirement imposed by 1026.19(e) or (f), the error would not be considered clerical.
Refunds 1026.19(f)(2)(v) If the creditor cures a tolerance violation by providing a refund to the consumer, the creditor must deliver or place in the mail a corrected Closing Disclosure that reflects the refund no later than 60 calendar days after consummation.
For example, assume that at consummation the consumer must pay four itemized charges that are subject to the good faith determination.
If the actual amounts paid by the consumer for the four itemized charges exceeded their respective estimates on the disclosures by $30, $25, $25, and $10, then there would be a $90 excess amount above the limitations prescribed by 1026.19(e)(3)(i).
The creditor does not violate 1026.19(e)(1)(i) if the creditor refunds the excess to the consumer no later than 60 days after consummation.
The creditor does not violate 1026.19(f)(1)(i) if the creditor delivers or places in the mail corrected disclosures reflecting the refund of the excess amount collected no later than 60 days after consummation.
Average Charges 1026.19(f)(3)(i)-(ii) In general, the amount imposed on the consumer for any settlement service must not exceed the amount the settlement service provider actually received for that service.
However, an average charge may be imposed instead of the actual amount received for a particular service, as long as the average charge satisfies certain conditions.
An average charge may be used if the following conditions are satisfied: 1.
The average charge is no more than the average amount paid for that service by or on behalf of all consumers and sellers for a class of transactions; 2.
The creditor or settlement service provider defines the class of transactions based on an appropriate period of time, geographic area, and type of loan; 3.
The creditor or settlement service provider uses the same average charge for every transaction within the defined class; and 4.
The creditor or settlement service provider does not use an average charge: a.
For any charge based on the loan amount or property value; or c. If doing so is otherwise prohibited by law.
A creditor must retain all documentation used to calculate the average charge for a particular class of transactions for at least three years after any settlement for which that average charge was used.
If the creditor develops representative samples of specific settlement costs for a particular class of transactions, the creditor may charge the average cost for that settlement service instead of the actual cost for such transactions.
An average-charge program may not be used in a way that inflates the cost for settlement services overall.
Adjustments and Retrospective Analysis Required A creditor may find that, even though it developed an average-cost pricing program in accordance with the requirements, over time it has collected more from consumers than it has paid to settlement service providers.
Example: Average Charge Used for Pest Inspections: # of Transactions: Total Charged to Consumer during period: Actual Average Cost Paid to Pest Inspection Provider by Creditor during period: Difference between average charge used and total paid to Pest Inspection Provider: Over/Under Payment by Consumer: $135 100 $13,500 $115 $20 $2,000 $115 70 $8,050 $125 ($10) ($700) January - April May- August In this example, the creditor over charged by $2000 from January to April and undercharged from May to August.
Refund the proportional overage to the affected consumers.
Factor the excess amount collected to decrease the average charge for the next period.
Default Method to Calculate Average Pricing If the creditor defines a 6 month period AND establishes a rolling monthly period of reevaluation the creditor is deemed to have complied with the requirements of 1026.19(f)(3)(ii) Time Period Used to Evaluate/Calculate Average Amount of Average Charge Time Period Average Charge Calculated Charge Applied Amount of Average Charge Applied Must recalculate starting the next month and each month afterwards Jan 1 Feb 1 Mar 1 Apr 1 to to to to Jun 30 Jul 31 Aug 31 Sep 31 $50 $49 $51 $50 Prospective analysis allowed but not required.
July 1 to Jul 31 Aug 1 to Aug 31 Sep 1 to Sep 30 Oct 1 to Oct 31 $50 $49 $51 $50 A Creditor can use 2 defined periods.
Winter (October to March 31) and Summer (April 1 to September 30.)
If the creditor can demonstrate that the average cost is always 15% higher during the winter, than the summer, the creditor may increase the average charge for the next winter period so long as the creditor performs the retrospective adjustments as discussed above.
Average-charge pricing is the exception to the rule in 1026.19(f)(3)(i) that consumers shall not pay more than the exact amount charged by a settlement service provider for the performance of that service.
If the creditor develops representative samples of specific settlement costs for a particular class of transactions, the creditor may charge the average cost for that settlement service instead of the actual cost for such transactions.
An average-charge program may not be used in a way that inflates the cost for settlement service overall.
Section 1026.19(f)(3)(ii)(B) requires a creditor to use an appropriate period of time, appropriate geographic area, and appropriate type of loan to define a particular class of transactions.
For purposes of 1026.19(f)(3)(ii)(B), a period of time is appropriate if the sample size is sufficient to calculate average costs with reasonable precision, provided that the period of time is not less than 30 days and not more than six months.
For purposes of 1026.19(f)(3)(ii)(B), a geographic area and loan type are appropriate if the sample size is sufficient to calculate average costs with reasonable precision, provided that the area and loan type are not defined in a way that pools costs between dissimilar populations.
Assume a creditor defines a geographic area that contains two subdivisions, one with a median appraisal cost of $200, and the other with a median appraisal cost of $1,000.
This geographic area would not satisfy the requirements of 1026.19(f)(3)(ii) because the cost characteristics of the two populations are dissimilar.
However, a geographic area would be appropriately defined if both subdivisions had a relatively normal distribution of appraisal costs, even if the distribution for each subdivision ranges from below $200 to above $1,000.
Assume a creditor defines a type of loan that includes two distinct rate products.
The median recording fee for one product is $80, while the median recording fee for the other product is $130.
This definition of loan type would not satisfy the requirements of 1026.19(f)(3)(ii) because the cost characteristics of the two products are dissimilar.
However, a type of loan would be appropriately defined if both products had a relatively normal distribution of recording fees, even if the distribution for each product ranges from below $80 to above $130.
If a creditor chooses to use an average charge for a settlement service for particular loan within a class, 1026.19(f)(3)(ii)(C) requires the creditor to use that average charge for that service on all loans within the class.
Assume a creditor elects to use an average charge for appraisal fees.
The creditor defines a class of transactions as all fixed rate loans originated between January 1 and April 30 secured by real property located within a particular metropolitan statistical area.
The creditor must then charge the average appraisal charge to all consumers obtaining fixed rate loans originated between May 1 and August 30 secured by real property located within the same metropolitan statistical area.
The example in paragraph i of this comment assumes that a consumer would not be required to pay the average appraisal charge unless an appraisal was required on that particular loan.
Using the example above, if a consumer applies for a loan within the defined class, but already has an appraisal report acceptable to the creditor from a prior loan application, the creditor may not charge the consumer the average appraisal fee because an acceptable appraisal report has already been obtained for the consumers application.
Similarly, although the creditor defined the class broadly to include all fixed rate loans, the creditor may not require the consumer to pay the average appraisal charge if the particular fixed rate loan program the consumer applied for does not require an appraisal.
The average charge must correspond to the average amount paid by or imposed on consumers and sellers during the prior defined time period.
For example, assume a creditor calculates an average tax certification fee based on four- month periods starting January 1 of each year.
The tax certification fees charged to a consumer on May 20 may not exceed the average tax certification fee paid from January 1 through April 30.
A creditor may delay the period by a reasonable amount of time if such delay is needed to perform the necessary analysis and update the affected systems, provided that each subsequent period is scheduled accordingly.
For example, a creditor may define a four-month period from January 1 to April 30 and begin using the average charge from that period on May 15, provided the average charge is used until September 15, at which time the average charge for the period from May 1 to August 31 becomes effective.
Adjustments based on retrospective analysis required.
Creditors using average charges must ensure that the total amount paid by or imposed on consumers for a service does not exceed the total amount paid to the providers of that service for the particular class of transactions.
A creditor may find that, even though it developed an average-cost pricing program in accordance with the requirements of 1026.19(f)(3)(ii), over time it has collected more from consumers than it has paid to settlement service providers.
For example, assume a creditor defines a class of transactions and uses that class to develop an average charge of $135 for pest inspections.
The creditor then charges $135 per transaction for 100 transactions from January 1 through April 30, but the actual average cost to the creditor of pest inspections during this period is $115.
The creditor then decreases the average charge for the May to August period to account for the lower average cost during the January to April period.
At this point, the creditor has collected $2,000 more than it has paid to settlement service providers for pest inspections.
The creditor then charges $115 per transaction for 70 transactions from May 1 to August 30, but the actual average cost to the creditor of pest inspections during this period is $125.
Based on the average cost to the creditor from the May to August period, the average charge to the consumer for the September to December period should be $125.
However, while the creditor spent $700 more than it collected during the May to August period, it collected $1,300 more than it spent from January to August.
In cases such as these, the creditor remains responsible for ensuring that the amount collected from consumers does not exceed the total amounts paid for the corresponding settlement services over time.
The creditor may develop a variety of methods that achieve this outcome.
For example, the creditor may choose to refund the proportional overage paid to the affected consumers.
Or the creditor may choose to factor in the excess amount collected to decrease the average charge for an upcoming period.
Although any method may comply with this requirement, a creditor is deemed to have complied if it defines a six-month time period and establishes a rolling monthly period of reevaluation.
For example, assume a creditor defines a six-month time period from January 1 to June 30 and the creditor uses the average charge starting July 1.
If, at the end of July, the creditor recalculates the average cost from February 1 to July 31, and then uses the recalculated average cost for transactions starting August 1, the creditor complies with the requirements of 1026.19(f)(3)(ii), even if the creditor actually collected more from consumers than was paid to providers over time.
Adjustments based on prospective analysis permitted, but not required.
A creditor may prospectively adjust average charges if it develops a statistically reliable and accurate method for doing so.
For example, assume a creditor calculates average charges based on two time periods: winter (October 1 to March 31), and summer (April 1 to September 30).
If the creditor can demonstrate that the average cost of a particular settlement service is always at least 15 percent more expensive during the winter period than the summer period, the creditor may increase the average charge for the next winter period by 15 percent over the average cost for the current summer period, provided, however, that the creditor performs retrospective periodic adjustments, as explained in comment 19(f)(3)(ii)-5.
Charges that vary with loan amount or property value.
An average charge may not be used for any charge that varies according to the loan amount or property value.
For example, an average charge may not be used for a transfer tax if the transfer tax is calculated as a percentage of the loan amount or property value.
Average charges also may not be used for any insurance premium.
For example, average charges may not be used for title insurance or for either the upfront premium or initial escrow deposit for hazard insurance.
An average charge may not be used where prohibited by any applicable State or local law.
For example, a creditor may not impose an average charge for an appraisal if applicable law prohibits creditors from collecting any amount in excess of the actual cost of the appraisal.
To comply with 1026.25, a creditor must retain all documentation used to calculate the average charge for a particular class of transactions for at least three years after any settlement for which that average charge was used.
The documentation must support the components and methods of calculation.
For example, if a creditor calculates an average charge for a particular county recording fee by simply averaging all of the relevant fees paid in the prior month, the creditor need only retain the receipts for the individual recording fees, a ledger demonstrating that the total amount received did not exceed the total amount paid over time, and a document detailing the calculation.
However, if a creditor develops complex algorithms for determining averages, not only must the creditor maintain the underlying receipts and ledgers, but the creditor must maintain documentation sufficiently detailed to allow an examiner to verify the accuracy of the calculations.
Use of Pre-Estimates 1026.19(e)(2)(ii) The TILA-RESPA rule does not prohibit a creditor or other person from providing a consumer with estimated terms or costs prior to the consumer receiving the Loan Estimate.
However, if a person (such as a creditor or broker) provides a consumer with a written estimate of terms or costs specific to that consumer before the consumer receives the Loan Estimate, it must clearly and conspicuously state at the top of the front of the first page of the written estimate Your actual rate, payment, and costs could be higher.
Get an official Loan Estimate before choosing the loan.
There are other restrictions on the form of this statement to assure it is not confused with the Loan Estimate: Must be in font size no smaller than 12-point font.
May not have headings, content, and format substantially similar to the Loan Estimate or the Closing Disclosure.
( 1026.19(e)(2)(ii); Comment 19(e)(2)(ii)-1) Comment 1026.
19(e)(2)(ii) Written information provided to consumer.
Section 1026.19(e)(2)(ii) requires the creditor or other person to include a clear and conspicuous statement on the top of the front of the first page of a written estimate of terms or costs specific to the consumer if it is provided to the consumer before the consumer receives the disclosures required by 1026.19(e)(1)(i).
For example, if the creditor provides a document showing the estimated monthly payment for a mortgage loan, and the estimate was based on the estimated loan amount and the consumers estimated credit score, then the creditor must include the statement on the document.
In contrast, if the creditor provides the consumer with a preprinted list of closing costs common in the consumers area, the creditor need not include the statement.
Similarly, the statement would not be required on a preprinted list of available rates for different loan products.
This requirement does not apply to an advertisement.
Timeshares 1026.19(e)(1)(iii)(C)) and (f)(1)(ii)(B) Loans secured by interests in timeshare plans are still subject to the TILA-RESPA rule, but the Bureau recognizes that these loans may commonly be consummated within a few days of the consumers application.
The Bureau thus adopted abbreviated timing, delivery, and disclosure obligations for these loans when consummation occurs within three business days of the application.
For these loans, creditors may forego a Loan Estimate and provide only the Closing Disclosure.
In addition, the waiting periods and timing requirements applicable to most loans subject to the TILA-RESPA Rule are inapplicable to loans secured by timeshare interests.
Rather, creditors are required to ensure only that the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure no later than consummation.
19(f)(1)(iii)-3 For example, if a consumer provides the creditor with an application, for a mortgage loan secured by a timeshare on Monday, June 1, and consummation of the timeshare transaction is scheduled for Friday, June 5, the creditor complies with 1026.19(f)(1)(ii)(B) by ensuring that the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure no later than consummation on Friday, June 5.
If a consumer provides the creditor with an application for a mortgage loan secured by a timeshare on Monday, June 1 and consummation of the timeshare transaction is scheduled for Tuesday, June 2, then the creditor complies with 1026.19(f)(1)(ii)(B) by ensuring that the consumer receives the Closing Disclosure no later than consummation on Tuesday, June 2.
In some cases, a Loan Estimate must be provided under 1026.19(e) before provision of the Closing Disclosure.
Special Information Booklet 1026.19(g) Creditors must provide a copy of the special information booklet to consumers who apply for a consumer credit transaction secured by real property, except in certain circumstances (see below).
The special information booklet is required pursuant to Section 5 of RESPA (12 U.S.C.
2604) and is published by the Bureau to help consumers applying for federally related mortgage loans understand real estate transactions If the consumer is applying for a HELOC subject to 1026.40, the creditor (or mortgage broker) can provide a copy of the brochure entitled When Your Home is On the Line: What You Should Know About Home Equity Lines of Credit instead of the special information booklet.
The creditor need not provide the special information booklet if the consumer is applying for a real property-secured consumer credit transaction that does not have the purpose of purchasing a one-to-four family residential property, such as a refinancing, a closed-end loan secured by a subordinate lien, or a reverse mortgage.
Timing Creditors must deliver or place in the mail the special information booklet not later than three business days after receiving the consumers loan application.
Withdrawals/Denials If the creditor denies the consumers application or if the consumer withdraws the application before the end of the three-business-day period, the creditor need not provide the special information booklet.
Multiple Applicants When two or more persons apply together for a loan, the creditor may provide a copy of the special information booklet to just one of them.
Mortgage Brokers If the consumer uses a mortgage broker, the mortgage broker must provide the special information booklet and the creditor need not do so.
Custom Booklets Creditors generally are required to use the booklets designed by the Bureau and may make only limited changes to the special information booklet.
The Bureau may issue revised or alternative versions of the special information booklet from time to time in the future.
Creditors should monitor the Federal Register for notice of updates.
The special information booklet may be reproduced in any form, provided that no changes are made, except as otherwise provided under 1026.19(g)(2).
Provision of the special information booklet as a part of a larger document does not satisfy the requirements of 1026.19(g).
Any color, size and quality of paper, type of print, and method of reproduction may be used so long as the booklet is clearly legible.
The special information booklet may be translated into languages other than English.
Changes to the booklet other than those specified in 1026.19(g)(2)(i) through (iv) and comment 19(g)(2)-3 do not comply with 1026.19(g).
Permissible changes to title of booklets in use before August 1, 2015.
Section 1026.19(g)(2)(iv) provides that the title appearing on the cover of the booklet shall not be changed.
Comment 19(g)(1)-1 states that the Bureau may, from time to time, issue revised or alternative versions of the special information booklet that address transactions subject to 1026.19(g) by publishing a notice in the Federal Register.
Until the Bureau issues a version of the special information booklet relating to the Loan Estimate and Closing Disclosure under 1026.37 and 1026.38, for applications that are received on or after August 1, 2015, a creditor may change the title appearing on the cover of the version of the special information booklet in use before August 1, 2015, provided the words settlement costs are used in the title.
Other Disclosures In addition to the Integrated Disclosures discussed above, the TILA-RESPA rule also changes some other post-consummation disclosures provided to consumers by creditors and servicers: 1.
Mortgage servicing transfer and partial payment notices ( 1026.39(a) and (d)).
Timing 1026.20(e)(5) For loans subject to the Escrow Closing Notice requirement, the creditor or servicer must provide consumers with a notice no later than three business days before the consumers escrow account is canceled.
The creditor or servicer must ensure that the consumer receives the Escrow Closing Notice no later than 30 business days before consumers escrow account is closed.
If the notice is not provided to the consumer in person, the consumer is considered to have received the disclosures three business days after they are delivered or placed in the mail.
Business day is given the meaning it has for purposes of providing the Closing Disclosurei.e., all calendar days except Sundays and the legal public holidays.
Coverage 1026.20(e)(1) The Escrow Closing Notice must be provided prior to cancelling an escrow account to any consumers for whom an escrow account was established in connection with a closed-end consumer credit transaction secured by a first lien on real property or a dwelling, except for reverse mortgages.
There are two exceptions to the requirement to provide the notice: 1.
Creditors and servicers are not required to provide the notice if the escrow account that is being cancelled was established solely in connection with the consumers delinquency or default on the underlying debt obligation.
Creditors and servicers are not required to provide the notice when the underlying debt obligation for which an escrow account was established is terminated, including by repayment, refinancing, rescission, and foreclosure.
(Comment 20(e)(1)-3) For purposes of this requirement, the term escrow account has the same meaning given to it as under Regulation X, 12 CFR 1024.17(b), and the term servicer has the same meaning given to it as under Regulation X, 12 CFR 1024.2(b).
Required Content 1026.20(e)(1)) Creditors and servicers must disclose certain information on the Escrow Closing Notice and may optionally disclose certain additional information.
The creditor or servicer must disclose: The date on which the account will be closed; That an escrow account may also be called an impound or trust account; The reason why the escrow account will be closed; That without an escrow account, the consumer must pay all property costs, such as taxes and homeowners insurance, directly, possibly in one or two large payments a year; A table, titled Cost to you, that contains an itemization of the amount of any fee the creditor or servicer imposes on the consumer in connection with the closure of the consumers escrow account, labeled Escrow Closing Fee, and a statement that the fee is for closing the escrow account; Under the reference In the future: o The consequences if the consumer fails to pay property costs, including the actions that a State or local government may take if property taxes are not paid and the actions the creditor or servicer may take if the consumer does not pay some or all property costs; o A telephone number that the consumer can use to request additional information about the cancellation of the escrow account; o Whether the creditor or servicer offers the option of keeping the escrow account open and, as applicable, a telephone number the consumer can use to request that the account be kept open; and o Whether there is a cut-off date by which the consumer can request that the account be kept open.
The creditor or servicer may also, at its option, disclose ( 1026.20(e)(3)): The creditor or servicers name or logo; The consumers name, phone number, mailing address and property address; The issue date of the notice; or The loan number, or the consumers account number.
In addition, the disclosures must: Contain a required heading that is more conspicuous than and precedes the required disclosures discussed above.
This standard generally requires that the disclosures in the Escrow Closing Notice be in a reasonably understandable form and readily noticeable to the consumer.
(Comment 20(e)(2)-1) Be written in 10-point font, at a minimum.
( 1026.20(e)(4)) Be grouped together on the front side of a one-page document.
The disclosures must be separate from all other materials, with the headings, content, order and format substantially similar to model form H-29 in appendix H to Regulation Z.
( 1026.20(e)(4)) Mortgage Transfer Notice 1026.39(a) and (d) 13.2.
If you are required by existing Regulation Z to provide mortgage transfer notices when the ownership of a mortgage loan is being transferred, you must include in the notice information related to the partial payment policy that will apply to the mortgage loan.
This post-consummation partial payment disclosure is required for a closed-end consumer credit transaction secured by a dwelling or real property, other than a reverse mortgage.
Partial payment disclosure 1026.39(d)(5) The partial payment disclosure must include: The heading Partial Payment over all of the following, additional information: o o o If periodic payments that are less than the full amount due are accepted, a statement that the covered person, using the term lender, may accept partial payments and apply such payments to the consumers loan; If periodic payments that are less than the full amount due are accepted but not applied to a consumers loan until the consumer pays the remainder of the full amount due, a statement that the covered person, using the term lender, may hold partial payments in a separate account until the consumer pays the remainder of the payment and then apply the full periodic payment to the consumers loan; If periodic payments that are less than the full amount due are not accepted, a statement that the covered person, using the term lender, does not accept any partial payments; and o A statement that, if the loan is sold, the new covered person, using the term lender, may have a different policy.
You may use the format of the partial payment disclosure illustrated by form H-25 of appendix H to Regulation Z.
The text illustrating the disclosure in form H-25 may be modified by you to suit the format of the mortgage transfer notice.
SECTION TWO Completing the LOAN ESTIMATE 12 CFR 1026.37 1.
Rounding 1026.37(o) (4) Dollar amounts must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar where noted in the regulation.
If an amount is required to be rounded but is composed of other amounts that are not required or permitted to be rounded, use the unrounded amounts in calculating the total and then round the final sum.
Conversely, if an amount is required to be rounded and is composed of rounded amounts, use the rounded amounts in calculating the total.
Percentage amounts may not be rounded and should be shown up to two or three decimals, as needed, except where noted in the regulation.
If a percentage amount is a whole number, show the whole number only with no decimals.
Date Issued 1026.37(a)(4) The date the Loan Estimate is mailed or delivered to the consumer.
In transactions involving a mortgage broker, the date disclosed is the date the mortgage broker mails or delivers the Loan Estimate to the consumer.
Applicants 1026.37(a)(5)-1/ (Comment 37(a)(5)-1) Applicants include the name and mailing address of the consumer(s) applying for the loan.
Use each Applicants name and mailing address if there are multiple Applicants.
An additional page may be added to the Loan Estimate if the space provided is insufficient to list all of the Applicants.
(Comment 37(a)(5)-1) Property 1026.37(a)(6)/ (Comment 37(a)(6)) Property is the address of the property (which must include the zip code) that will secure the transaction.
If the address of the Property is unavailable, use a description of the location of the property, for example a lot number.
Personal property such as furniture or appliances that also secures the credit transaction may be, but is not required to be included as Property.
An additional page may not be appended to the Loan Estimate to disclose a description of personal property.
However, an additional page may be added to describe additional real property.
Where more than one property secures the credit transaction, disclosure of all the properties is required.
Sale Price or Appraised Value or Estimated Value 1026.37(a)(7)/ (Comment 37(a)(7)) For transactions that involve a seller, insert the contract sale price of the property.
If personal property is included in the Sale Price of the Property, use that price without any reduction for the appraised or estimated value of the personal property.
If the loan is for a transaction without a seller, use Appraised Value or Estimated Value provided by the consumer.
(Comment 1026.37(a)(7)-1) If the creditor has obtained any appraisals or valuations of the property for the application at the time the disclosure is issued to the consumer, the value determined by the appraisal or valuation to be used during underwriting for the application is disclosed as the estimated property value.
If the creditor has obtained multiple appraisals or valuations and has not yet determined which one will be used during underwriting, it may disclose the value from any appraisal or valuation it reasonably believes it may use in underwriting the transaction.
In a transaction that involves a seller, if the sale price is not yet known, the creditor complies with 1026.37(a)(7) if it discloses the estimated value of the property that it used as the basis for the disclosures in the Loan Estimate.
Loan Term 1026.37 (a)(8) Describe the Loan Term as years when the Loan Term is in whole years.
For a Loan Term that is more than 24 months but is not whole years, describe using years and months with the abbreviations yr. and mo., respectively.
For example, a loan term of 185 months is disclosed as 15 yr., 5mo.
For a Loan Term that is less than 24 months and not whole years, use months only with the abbreviation mo.
Section 1026.37(a)(8) requires disclosure of the term to maturity of the credit transaction.
If the term to maturity is adjustable, i.e., it is not known with certainty at consummation, the creditor complies with 1026.37(a)(8), if it discloses the possible range of the loan term, including the maximum number of years possible under the terms of the legal obligation.
For example, if the loan term depends on the value of interest rate adjustments during the term of the loan, to calculate the maximum loan term, the creditor assumes that the interest rate rises as rapidly as possible after consummation, taking into account the terms of the legal obligation, including any applicable caps on interest rate adjustments and lifetime interest rate cap.
Purpose 1026.37(a)(9) Describe the consumers intended use for the loan.
Purpose is disclosed using one of four descriptions: Purchase, Refinance, Construction, or Home Equity Loan.
Purchase is disclosed if the loan will be used to finance the Propertys acquisition.
Refinance is disclosed if the loan will be used for the refinance of an existing obligation that is secured by the Property (even if the creditor is not the holder or servicer of the original obligation).
Construction is disclosed if the loan will be used to finance the initial construction of a dwelling on the property disclosed on the Loan Estimate.
Home Equity Loan is disclosed if the loan will be used for any other purpose.
Product 1026.37(a)(10) Provide a description of the loan.
You are required to include two pieces of information in this disclosure: 1.
The first piece of information is any payment feature that may change the periodic payment, which includes Negative Amortization, Interest Only, Step Payment, Balloon Payment, or Seasonal Payment.
Additionally, the duration of the relevant payment feature must be disclosed with a Negative Amortization, Interest Only, Step Payment, or Balloon Payment.
For example, a payment feature where there is a five-year period during which the payments cover only interest, and are not applied to the principal balance, would be disclosed as a 5 Year Interest Only for the payment feature.
Negative Amortization is when the principal balance of the loan may increase due to the addition of accrued interest to the principal balance.
Interest Only is when one or more regular periodic payments may be applied only to interest accrued and not to the principal of the loan.
Step Payment is when the scheduled variations in regular periodic payment amounts occur that are not caused by changes to the interest rate during the loan term.
Balloon Payment is when the terms of the legal obligation include a payment that is more than two times that of a regular periodic payment.
Seasonal Payment is when the terms of the legal obligation expressly provide that regular periodic payments are not scheduled between specified unit- periods on a regular basis.
For example, a teacher loan that does not require monthly payments during summer months has a Seasonal Payment.
If the loan can be described with more than one of these descriptions, only the first applicable feature is disclosed.
For example, a loan that would result in both Negative Amortization and a Balloon Payment would only disclose Negative Amortization as part of Product.
The second piece of information disclosed is whether the loan uses an Adjustable Rate, Step Rate, or Fixed Rate to determine the interest rate applied to the principal balance.
An interest rate is an Adjustable Rate if the interest rate may increase after consummation, but the rates that will apply or the periods for which they will apply are not known at consummation.
Each description must be preceded by the duration of any introductory rate or payment period, and the first adjustment period, as applicable.
For example, a product with an introductory rate that is fixed for the first five years and adjusts every three years starting in year 6 is a 5/3 Adjustable Rate.
When there is no introductory period for an Adjustable Rate, disclose 0.
For example, a product with no introductory rate that adjusts every year after consummation is a 0/1 Adjustable Rate.
An interest rate is a Step Rate if the interest rate will change after consummation and the rates that will apply and the periods for which they apply are known at consummation.
Each description must be preceded by the duration of any introductory rate or payment period, and the first adjustment period, as applicable.
For example, a product with a step rate that lasts for ten years, adjusts every year for five years, and then adjusts every three years for the next 15 years is a 10/1 Step Rate.
When there is no introductory rate for a Step Rate, disclose 0 and then the applicable time period until the first adjustment.
An interest rate is a Fixed Rate if the interest rate is not an Adjustable Rate or Step Rate.
The following are examples of Product with both pieces of information included: Year 7 Balloon Payment, 3/1 Step Rate: a step rate with an introductory interest rate that lasts for three years and adjusts each year thereafter until a balloon payment is due in the seventh year of the loan term.
2 Year Negative Amortization: a fixed rate product with a step-payment feature for the first two years of the legal obligation that may negatively amortize.
When the time periods disclosed in Product are not in whole years, for time periods of 24 months or more, disclose the applicable fraction of a year by use of decimals rounded to two places.
For time periods of 24 months or less, disclose the number of months with the abbreviation mo.
For example: An Adjustable Rate Product with an introductory interest rate for 31 months that adjusts every year thereafter is a 2.58/1 Adjustable Rate.
An Adjustable Rate Product with an introductory interest rate for 18 months that adjusts every 18 months thereafter is an 18 mo./18 mo.
For more Product examples, please see Comments 37(a)(10)-1, -2 and -3 in the Official Interpretations to Regulation Z.
Special note on Hybrid Loans When disclosing a hybrid loan, a creditor should disclose the loan as an Adjustable Rate loan.
Although the interest rates during the step periods are known, the loan features periods where the interest will be adjusted, and such rates are not known at the time of consummation.
Due to this uncertainty, hybrid loans more closely resemble Adjustable Rate loans and should be disclosed as such.
Additional confusion arises when disclosing the loan interest rate when the initial rate calculation differs from subsequent calculations.
Since the rule requires creditors to use the best information available at the time of the loan consummation, the creditor should disclose the initial interest rate applicable at the date of consummation ( 1026.37(b)(2)).
Both Section 1026.37(b)(2) of the rule and the preamble to this section clearly state that the disclosed interest rate should be the rate at consummation.
This requirement does allow creditors to disclose an interest rate that is a composite of different interest rates that are applicable when a transaction features multiple interest rates for different portions of a loans principal balance in a precomputed transaction.
However, the allowance stems from the overarching rule that the disclosed interest rate should be the rate that applies at the consummation of the transaction.2 Loan Type 1026.37(a)(11) Loan Type is the type of the loan, such as Conventional or FHA.
For Loan Type, disclose: Conventional if the loan is not guaranteed or insured by a Federal or State government agency, FHA if the loan is insured by the Federal Housing Administration, VA if the loan is guaranteed by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, and Other with a brief description if the loan is insured or guaranteed by another Federal or a State agency.
( 1026.37(a)(11)) Loan ID# 1026.37(a)(12) Loan ID # is the creditors loan identification number that may be used by a creditor, consumer, and other parties to identify the transaction.
The Loan ID # may contain alpha-numeric characters and must be unique to the particular transaction.
The same Loan ID # may not be used for different, but related, loan transactions (such as different loans to the same borrower).
When a revised Loan Estimate is issued, the Loan ID # must be sufficient for the purpose of identifying the transaction associated with the initial Loan Estimate.
Rate Lock 1026.37(a)(13) Indicate the rate is locked with Yes, indicate the rate is not locked with No.
When the interest rate is locked at the time of the Loan Estimates delivery, the date and time (including the applicable time zone) when the lock period ends must be disclosed.
The date and time (including the applicable time zone) at which the estimated closing costs expire must be disclosed on every Loan Estimate.
2 Posted by ALTA Blog at 6:20 AM on 11/18/2014 in Integrated Mortgage Disclosures | Permalink | Comments (0) Loan Terms 2.2.
Disclose in the Loan Terms table: Loan Amount (if the amount is in whole dollars, do not disclose cents) (1026.37(o)(4)), Initial Interest Rate, Initial Monthly Principal & Interest amount, Any adjustments to these amounts after consummation, Whether the loan includes a Prepayment Penalty, and Whether the loan includes a Balloon Payment.
( 1026.37(b)) Interest Rate & Monthly Principal & Interest 1026.37 (b)(2) and (b)(3) If the initial Interest Rate is not known at consummation, the fully-indexed rate is disclosed; a fully-indexed rate is the interest rate calculated using the index value and margin at the time of consummation.
( 1026.37(b)(2)) The initial principal and interest payment amount also would be calculated using the same fully- indexed rate.
( 1026.37(b)(3)) Adjustment to Loan Amount, Interest Rate, and Monthly Principal & Interest after consummation ( 1026.37(b)(6)) Under the subheading Can this amount increase after closing?, When the Loan Amount, Interest Rate, or Monthly Principal & Interest payment cannot increase after consummation, disclose No where applicable.
( 1026.37(b)(6)) If the Loan Amount, Interest Rate, or Monthly Principal & Interest amounts can increase after consummation, disclose Yes where applicable with the information pertinent to the adjustment after consummation.
37(b)(6)) For an adjustment in Loan Amount, the creditor must also disclose the maximum principal balance for the transaction and the due date (expressed as the year or month in which it occurs, rather than an exact date) of the last payment that may cause the principal balance to increase, together with a statement whether the maximum principal balance may or will occur under the terms of the legal obligation.
( 1026.37(b)(6)(i)) The date disclosed is the year in which the event occurs, counting from the due date of the initial periodic payment.
( 1026.37(b)(8)(ii)) For an adjustment in the Interest Rate, also disclose the frequency of interest rate adjustments, the date when the interest rate may first adjust, the maximum interest rate, and the first date when the interest rate can reach the maximum interest rate.
( 1026.37(b)(6)(ii)) The date disclosed is the year in which the event occurs, counting from the date that interest for the first scheduled periodic payment begins to accrue after consummation.
( 1026.37(b)(8)(i)) Also, disclose and reference the Adjustable Interest Rate (AIR) Table on page 2 of the Loan Estimate.
( 1026.37(b)(6)(ii)) For an adjustment to the Monthly Principal & Interest, the creditor would also disclose the scheduled frequency of adjustments, due date of the first adjustment, and the maximum possible amount (and the earliest date it can occur) of the Monthly Principal & Interest.
In addition, if there is a period during which only interest is required to be paid, also disclose that fact and the due date of the last periodic payment of such period.
( 1026.37(b)(6)(iii)) The date disclosed is the year in which the event occurs, counting from the due date of the initial payment.
( 1026.37(b)(8)(ii)) Also, disclose and reference the Adjustable Payment (AP) Table on page 2.
( 1026.37(b)(6)(iii)) When the time periods disclosed in Product are not in whole years, for time periods of 24 months or more, disclose the applicable fraction of a year by use of decimals rounded to two places.
For time periods of 24 months or less, disclose the number of months with the abbreviation mo.
For example: An Adjustable Rate Product with an introductory interest rate for 31 months that adjusts every year thereafter is a 2.58/1 Adjustable Rate.
An Adjustable Rate Product with an introductory interest rate for 18 months that adjusts every 18 months thereafter is an 18 mo./18 mo.
Prepayment Penalty and Balloon Payment 1026.37(b)(4) and ( 1026.37(b)(5) A Prepayment Penalty is a charge imposed for paying all or part of a transactions principal before the date on which the principal is due.
It does not include a waived third-party charge that the creditor imposes if the consumer prepays the loans entire principal sooner than 36 months after closing.
( 1026.37(b)(4)) A Balloon Payment is a payment that is more than two times a regular periodic payment.
( 1026.37(b)(5)) Under the subheading Does the loan have these features?, when the loan has a Prepayment Penalty or a Balloon Payment disclose Yes, as applicable.
( 1026.37(b)(4) and (5)) When the answer is Yes to either, also disclose, as applicable: The maximum amount of the Prepayment Penalty and the date when the period during which the penalty may be imposed terminates.
For example, As high as $3,240 if you pay off the loan in the first two years.
( 1026.37(b)(7)(i)) The maximum amount of the Balloon Payment and the due date of such payment.
For example, you will have to pay $149,263 at the end of year 7.
Projected Payments 1026.37 (c) 2 and (c) (3) and all corresponding Comments General Instructions The Projected Payments table shows estimates of the periodic payments that the consumer will make over the life of the loan.
Creditors must disclose estimates of the following periodic payment amounts in the Projected Payments table: Principal & Interest; Mortgage Insurance; Estimated Escrow; Estimated Total Monthly Payment; and Estimated Taxes, Insurance, & Assessments, even if not paid with escrow funds.
The Projected Payments table also describes whether taxes, insurance, and other assessments will be paid with funds in the consumers escrow account.
Show in one column the initial Periodic Payment (or range of payments if required) for each of Principal & Interest, Mortgage Insurance, and Estimated Escrow.
Depending on the features of the loan, subsequent periodic payments also may be required to be disclosed.
The Periodic Payment is the regularly scheduled payment of Principal & Interest, Mortgage Insurance, and Estimated Escrow.
Initial Periodic Payment To calculate the initial Periodic Payment, use the interest rate that will apply at closing, including any initial discounted or premium interest rate.
If the interest rate at closing is not known, such as for an adjustable rate loan without an introductory fixed rate period, use the fully-indexed rate to determine the initial Periodic Payment.
Subsequent Periodic Payments If any of the triggering events listed below may occur during the life of the loan, add a column to show the amount of the periodic payments after the triggering event.
The Principal & Interest amount or range of such amount may change (for example if the loan has an adjustable rate).
o Negative Amortization for loans that have a Negative Amortization feature, the Principal & Interest amount may change when the Negative Amortization period ends under the terms of the legal obligation, meaning the consumer must begin making payments that do not result in an increase of the principal balance.
Interest Only for Interest Only loans, the Principal & Interest amount may change when the Interest Only period ends, meaning the consumer must begin making payments that do not defer repayment of principal.
o o Minor Periodic Payment variations resulting solely from the fact that months have different numbers of days are not triggering events.
The lender must automatically terminate Mortgage Insurance or any functional equivalent.
( 1026.37(c)(1)(i)(C)) Even if the borrower may cancel the insurance earlier, use the date on which the lender must automatically terminate Mortgage Insurance coverage under applicable law.
Only termination of Mortgage Insurance is a triggering event, while a decline in Mortgage Insurance premiums is not.
(Comment 37(c)(1)(i)(C)-3) When the Periodic Payment amount changes more than once in a single year, show in the subsequent column the Periodic Payment amounts in the year following the one in which there were multiple changes.
A year for this table is the 12-month period following the due date of the initial Periodic Payment.
Number of Columns The maximum number of columns the Periodic Payments table may contain is four.
If a loan has more than four triggering events, show a range of payments in the fourth column that reflects all remaining periodic payments not shown in the first three columns.
EXCEPT: A Balloon Payment scheduled as a final payment always requires its own column.
If disclosing the final Balloon Payment means that other triggering events will not fit within the four-column maximum, show the other triggering events as a range of payments in the third column.
A Balloon Payment that is not a final payment is a triggering event that does not necessarily require its own column.
The automatic termination of Mortgage Insurance generally requires the corresponding periodic payment to be shown in its own column, unless doing so would exceed the four-column maximum.
o Where the automatic termination of Mortgage Insurance need not be shown in its own column, the column showing the next periodic payment or range of payments should show the periodic payment amount without Mortgage Insurance.
Show a range of payments rather than a single payment when: o o There are more triggering events than can be shown in four columns and thus one column must be used to show two or more periodic payment amounts.
More than one of the triggering events occurs in a single year or one of the triggering events occurs in the same year as the initial periodic payment.
o The Principal & Interest payment may adjust based on an interest rate index and the rates are not yet known (i.e., for an adjustable rate loan).
For a column that contains a range of payments, show both a minimum and maximum payment using rounded dollar amounts.
For an Adjustable Rate loan, use the maximum and minimum interest rates that could apply such as through an interest rate cap.
Ranges of payments are required only for the Principal & Interest amount and the Estimated Total Monthly Payment.
Do not show a range of payments for Mortgage Insurance or Estimated Escrow.
Payment Calculation Column Headings To the right of the Payment Calculation label, as column headings, use the years of the loan during which the payments or ranges of payments shown in that column will apply.
Use a sequence of whole years, counting from the due date of the initial Periodic Payment.
o For example, a two-column projected payments table might contain the headings years 1-7 and Years 8-30 if a triggering event occurs 85 months after the due date of the initial Periodic Payment.
If a triggering event occurs in the middle of a year, use the next year in sequence as the heading for the subsequent column.
o For example, assume a 30-year loan that requires Interest Only payments for the first 54 months from the due date of the initial Periodic Payment.
The column heading for the initial Periodic Payment would be Years 1-5 and the column heading for the subsequent Periodic Payment would be Years 6-30 because the triggering event occurs during the 5th year of the loan.
For Periodic Payments that may increase based on an adjustment of the interest rate, use the maximum loan term possible under the terms of the legal obligation.
To calculate the maximum loan term, assume that the interest rate rises as rapidly as is possible under the terms of the legal obligation, taking into account any applicable interest rate caps.
For a Balloon Payment scheduled as a final payment, use Final Payment as the column heading.
Principal & Interest Use the amount due for Principal & Interest for the period shown in the column heading.
For payments of Interest Only, use the phrase Only Interest under the amount of the payment or range of payments.
Adjustable Rate Loans Generally, calculate Principal & Interest using the maximum payments by assuming that the interest rate will rise as rapidly as possible, taking into account the terms of the legal obligation, including any applicable caps on interest rate adjustments and lifetime interest rate cap.
Other laws, such as a State usury law, can set the maximum rate if the legal obligation does not include a lifetime interest rate cap.
Calculate the minimum payments by assuming that the interest rate will decrease as rapidly as possible, taking into account any introductory rates, caps on interest rate adjustments, and lifetime interest rate floor.
For an Adjustable Rate loan based on an index that has no lifetime interest rate floor, the minimum interest rate is equal to the margin.
(Comment 37(c)(2)(i)-1) For loans with a Negative Amortization feature, calculate Principal & Interest using the maximum payment amounts after the end of the period during which the principal balance may increase by assuming the maximum principal amount permitted under the terms of the legal obligation at the end of the period.
Calculate the minimum payment amount by assuming the interest rate is the minimum possible under the terms of the legal obligation.
(Comment 37(c)(2)(i)-2) For loans with a Balloon Payment feature that may change depending on previous interest rate adjustments, calculate Principal & Interest using the assumptions for minimum and maximum interest rates described above and show as a range of payments.
(Comment 37(c)(2)(i)-3) Mortgage Insurance Disclose the maximum amount payable as Mortgage Insurance that corresponds to the Principal & Interest payment shown in the same column.
Mortgage Insurance includes any mortgage guarantee that provides coverage similar to mortgage insurance (such as a United States Department of Veterans Affairs or United States Department of Agriculture guarantee), even if not technically considered insurance under State or other applicable law.
Calculate Mortgage Insurance premiums based on the principal balance that will exist after changes to the interest rate and payment amounts pursuant to the legal obligation.
The calculations should take into account any initial discounted or premium interest rate.
For example, for an Adjustable Rate transaction that has a discounted interest rate during an initial five-year period, calculate Mortgage Insurance premiums using a composite rate based on the rate in effect during the initial five-year period and, thereafter, the fully-indexed rate, unless otherwise required by applicable law.
Disclose the Mortgage Insurance amount that corresponds with the Principal & Interest amount shown in the same column, even if Mortgage Insurance is paid on a different schedule than Principal & Interest.
Estimated Escrow Disclose the amount the consumer will pay into an escrow account each month under the terms of the legal obligation.
If an escrow account will not be established, disclose 0.
Disclose if there will be an escrow account, but the escrow account will be closed during the time-frame attributable to the applicable Periodic Payment.
Estimated Tot al Monthly Payment For each column, disclose the sum of the Principal& Interest, Mortgage Insurance and Estimated Escrow as Estimated Total Monthly Payment.
The amount is rounded if any of the component amounts are rounded.
Estimated Taxes, Insurance & Assessments 1026.37(c)(4) As Estimated Taxes, Insurance & Assessments, disclose the total monthly amount due for Property Taxes, Homeowners Insurance, charges imposed by a cooperative, condominium or homeowners association; ground rent; leasehold payments; and certain insurance premiums or charges if required by the lender.
Disclose Estimated Taxes, Insurance & Assessments as a rounded number.
Homeowners Insurance is any insurance against loss or damage, or against liability arising out of the property.
The insurance premiums included as Estimated Taxes, Insurance & Assessments are for credit life, accident, health, or loss-of-income insurance; insurance against loss of or damage to property, or against liability arising out of the ownership or use of property; and debt cancellation or debt suspension coverage.
To calculate Property Taxes, Homeowners Insurance, and other insurance premiums, use the taxable assessed value of the real property securing the transaction after consummation, including the value of any improvements or construction, to the extent known, and the replacement costs of the property over the first year.
Include these amounts as Estimated Taxes, Insurance & Assessments even if an escrow account will not be established under the terms of the legal obligation.
By the use of checkboxes, disclose if Property Taxes, Homeowners Insurance, or Other required charges will be paid from an escrow account established under the terms of the legal obligation under the heading This estimate includes.
When applicable, describe briefly the type of charge to the right of the word Other.
If there is more than one Other charge, disclose one type and the phrase and additional charges.
(Comment 37(c)(4)(iv)-1) Under a heading of In Escrow?
: disclose Yes when an escrow account will be established that will pay the item; or disclose No when an escrow account will not be established under the terms of the legal obligation for Property Taxes, Homeowners Insurance, and Other.
If more than one item is disclosed as Other, disclose Yes, Some when one item is included and another is not.
Costs at Closing 1026.37(d)(1) Costs at Closing table shows: Estimated Closing Costs are calculated in the same manner as the Total Closing Costs disclosed on page 2 of the Loan Estimate.
The Total Closing Costs are also itemized to show from page 2 of the Loan Estimate: The total of the Loan Costs table, The total of the Other Costs table, and Lender Credits in the Total Closing Costs subheading.
The estimated amount of cash the consumer will be expected to pay at closing is also shown as Estimated Cash to Close.
This amount is the same as the Estimated Cash to Close, from the Calculating Cash to Close table on page 2 of the Loan Estimate.
For transactions without a seller, an Alternative Costs at Closing table together with an Alternative Calculating Cash to Close table on page 2 of the Loan Estimate can be used in place of the Costs at Closing table shown above.
The Alternative Costs at Closing table contains a variation that places checkboxes with Estimated Cash to Close in order to indicate whether the cash is due from or to the consumer.
If the Alternative Costs at Closing table is used, then the Alternative Calculating Cash to Close on page 2 of the Loan Estimate also must be used.
General Components Up to four main categories of costs are disclosed on page 2 of the Loan Estimate: A good-faith itemization of the Loan Costs and Other Costs associated with the loan.
A Calculating Cash to Close table that shows how the amount of cash needed at closing is calculated.
For transactions with adjustable monthly payments, an Adjustable Payments (AP) Table with relevant information about how the monthly payments will change.
For transactions with adjustable interest rates, an Adjustable Interest Rate (AIR) Table with relevant information about how the interest rate will change.
The items associated with the mortgage are broken down into two general types, Loan Costs and Other Costs.
Generally, Loan Costs are those costs paid by the consumer to the creditor and third-party providers of services the creditor requires to be obtained by the consumer during the origination of the loan.
Other Costs include taxes, governmental recording fees, and certain other payments involved in the real estate closing process.
Items that are a component of title insurance or are for conducting the closing must include the introductory description of Title.
If State law requires additional disclosures, those additional disclosures are made on a document whose pages are separate from, and not presented as part of, the Loan Estimate.
The amounts disclosed in the Loan Costs and Other Costs table are rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
The daily amount of Prepaid Interest and the monthly amounts for the items in the Initial Escrow Payment at Closing in the labels are not rounded, but the calculated amounts for those items are rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
The Loan Costs and Other Costs tables are further broken down in the next subsections.
Loan Costs Origination Charges 0126.37(f)(1) Origination Charges are items the consumer will pay to each creditor and loan originator for originating and extending credit.
Items that are listed under the subheading Origination Charges may include, for example, application fee, origination fee, underwriting fee, processing fee, verification fee, and rate-lock fee.
First, include the amount paid, if any, by the consumer to the creditor to reduce the interest rate (sometimes referred to as points) as both a percentage of the loan amount and a dollar amount.
If no points are charged, then leave blank both the percentage of points stated in the label and the dollar amount.
Any other items that the consumer will pay to the creditor and loan originator may also be disclosed, up to 13 individual items.
If there are more than 13 Origination Charges, disclose the total amount of the items that exceed 12 as Additional Charges.
Describe the items, other than for points paid, using terminology that clearly and conspicuously describes the service that is disclosed.
The following items should be itemized separately in the Origination Charges subheading: Compensation paid directly by a consumer to a loan originator that is not also the creditor; or Any charge imposed to pay for a loan level pricing adjustment assessed on the creditor that is passed on to the consumer as a cost at consummation and not as an adjustment to the interest rate.
Only items paid directly by the consumer to compensate a loan originator are Origination Charges.
Do not disclose compensation to a loan originator paid indirectly by a creditor through the interest rate on the Loan Estimate.
Special Note Points and Fees When disclosing points and fees, creditors should determine whether the charge is associated with origination costs or whether it is a form of interest.
If the charge is not intended to reduce the interest rate, then it is not a point and cannot be disclosed as such.
This is the case even if the charge is a portion of the loan amount.
Only points charged in connection with an interest rate reduction may be disclosed as points on the Loan Estimate.
This requirement prohibits creditors from identifying origination fees as points as a means of preserving its tax deductibility for the consumer.
Any charges other than points require clear and conspicuous terminology that describes the service.
If there are no charges that reduce the interest rate, creditors should leave the points line on the form blank rather than mark the line N/A.
When a creditor pays a LLPA to the secondary market purchaser, the creditor may have to disclose the charge in certain situations.
If the creditor does not charge the consumer an upfront fee, but rather passes the cost of the LLPA to the consumer through interest, the creditor does not need to disclose this charge as it is not considered a settlement charge under the rule.
However, if the creditor charges an upfront fee for the LLPA, the creditor should disclose the fee based on how it is charged.
If the LLPA is charged at closing as a flat origination charge, the charge should be labeled an origination charge.
Alternatively, if the creditor includes the cost of the LLPA in the interest rate, and then allows the consumer to pay a point to reduce the interest rate, the charge would be disclosed as a point on the Loan Estimate.3 3.3.
Services You Cannot Shop For 1026.37(f)(2) Services You Cannot Shop For are items provided by persons other than the creditor or mortgage broker that the consumer cannot shop for and will pay for at settlement.
Items listed as Services You Cannot Shop For must use terminology that describes each item, and disclose them in alphabetical order.
3 Posted by ALTA Blog at 8:47 AM on 12/9/2015 in Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, Integrated Mortgage Disclosures | Permalink | Comments (0) A consumer is not permitted to shop if the consumer must choose a provider from a list provided by the creditor.
Services You Cannot Shop For might include: Appraisal fee, Appraisal management company fee, Credit report fee, Flood determination fee, Government funding fee (such as a VA or USDA guarantee fee, or any other fee paid to a government entity as part of a governmental loan program), Homeowners association certification fee, Lenders attorney fee, Tax status search fee, Third-party subordination fee, Title closing protection letter fee, Title lenders title insurance policy, and An upfront mortgage insurance fee (unless the fee is a prepayment of future premiums or a payment into an escrow account).
Describe services related to the issuance of title insurance policies with the word Title at the beginning of the item.
Items that are required for the issuance of title insurance policies may include: Examination and evaluation of title evidence to determine the insurability of the title being examined and what items to include or exclude in any title commitment and policy to be issued, Preparation and issuance of the title commitment or other document that discloses the status of title, identifies the conditions that must be met before the policy will be issued, and obligates the insurer to issue a policy of title insurance if such conditions are met, Resolution of title underwriting issues and taking steps needed to satisfy any conditions for the issuance of title insurance policies, Preparation and issuance of the title insurance policies, and Payment of premiums for any lenders title insurance coverage.
Comment 1026.37(f)(2)-4 Services you cannot shop for.
Section 1026.37(f)(2) and (3) requires disclosure of the amount the consumer will pay for the lenders title insurance policy.
However, an owners title insurance policy that covers the consumer and is not required to be purchased by the creditor is only disclosed pursuant to 1026.37(g).
Accordingly, the creditor must quote the amount of the lenders title insurance coverage pursuant to 1026.37(f)(2) or (3) as applicable based on the type of lenders title insurance policy required by its underwriting standards for that loan.
The amount disclosed for the lenders title insurance policy is the amount of the premium without any adjustment that might be made for the simultaneous purchase of an owners title insurance policy.
This amount may be disclosed as Title Premium for Lenders Coverage, or in any similar manner that clearly indicates the amount of the premium disclosed is for the lenders title insurance coverage.
See comment 37(g)(4)-1 for a discussion of the disclosure of the premium for an owners title insurance policy that covers the consumer.
{For more information on Owners title Insurance, See Other Costs Section below.}
The owners policy should be disclosed in the Other category and should be calculated by adding the simultaneous issuance premium to the full owners title insurance premium, and then deducting the full premium for the lenders coverage.
The owners policy must be listed as optional on the Loan Estimate and Closing Disclosure.
Disclose no more than 13 Services You Cannot Shop For.
If there are more than 13 Services You Cannot Shop For, disclose the total amount of the items that exceed 12 with the label Additional Charges.
An addendum to the Loan Estimate cannot be used to disclose the additional items.
Services You Can Shop For 1026.37(f)(3) Services You Can Shop For are provided by persons other than the creditor or mortgage broker and are services that the consumer can shop for and will pay for at settlement.
( 1026.37(f)(3)) Items listed as Services You Can Shop For must use terminology that describes each item and disclose them in alphabetical order.
A creditor permits a consumer to shop for an item if the creditor permits the consumer to select the provider of that item, subject to reasonable requirements (such as appropriate licensing of the provider).
Services You Can Shop For might include: Pest inspection fee, Survey fee, Title closing agent fee, and Title closing protection letter fee.
Describe services related to the issuance of title insurance policies with the word Title at the beginning of the item.
Items that are required for the issuance of title insurance policies may include: Examination and evaluation of title evidence to determine the insurability of the title being examined and what items to include or exclude in any title commitment and policy to be issued, Preparation and issuance of the title commitment or other document that discloses the status of title, identifies the conditions that must be met before the policy will be issued, and obligates the insurer to issue a policy of title insurance if such conditions are met, Resolution of title underwriting issues and taking steps needed to satisfy any conditions for the issuance of title insurance policies, Preparation and issuance of the title insurance policies, and Payment of premiums for any lenders title insurance coverage.
The creditor must disclose the amount of the premium for the lenders title insurance coverage without any adjustment to the premium that might be made for the simultaneous purchase of an owners title insurance policy.
Disclose no more than 14 Services You Can Shop For) If there are more than 14 Services You Can Shop For, disclose the total amount of the items that exceed 13 with the label Additional Charges.
An addendum to the Loan Estimate can be used to disclose the additional items.
Total Loan Costs 1026.37 (f)(4) Total Loan Costs is the sum of the subtotals of Origination Charges, Services You Cannot Shop For, and Services You Can Shop For.
Other Costs Other Costs are established by government action, determined by standard calculations applied to ongoing fixed costs, or based on an obligation incurred by the consumer independently of any requirement imposed by the creditor.
(Other items that are required to be paid at or before closing pursuant to the contract for sale between the consumer and a seller are disclosed on the Loan Estimate to the extent the creditor has knowledge of those items when it issues the Loan Estimate.
Other Costs must be disclosed in the order listed in the regulation, with any additional items listed in alphabetical order in subsequent lines of the applicable subheading.
An addendum to the Loan Estimate cannot be used for additional items on the Other Costs table.
If all of the charges cannot be itemized in the number of lines provided in a subheading of the Other Costs table, the total of those items that exceed the number permitted are disclosed with the label Additional Charges on the last line of that subheading.
Taxes and Other Government Fees 1026.37(g)(5) Under Taxes and Other Government Fees, disclose Recording Fees and Other Taxes first and Transfer Taxes second.
Recording Fees and Other Taxes are fees assessed by a government authority to record and index the loan and title documents as required under State or local law, together with any charges or fees imposed by a State or local government that are not Transfer Taxes and Recording Fees and Other Taxes do not include fees that are based on the Sale Price of the Property or Loan Amount.
For example, a fee for recording a subordination that is $20, plus $3 for each page over three pages, is included as Recording Fees and Other Taxes; but a fee of $1,250 based on 0.5% of the Loan Amount is included as Transfer Taxes, and not included as Recording Fees and Other Taxes.
Transfer Taxes are State and local government fees on mortgages and home sales that are based on the Loan Amount or Sale Price of the Property.
The name that is used under State or local law to refer to these amounts is not determinative of whether or not they are disclosed as Transfer Taxes on the Loan Estimate.
Disclose only Transfer Taxes paid by the consumer on the Loan Estimate.
Whether the consumer pays the transfer tax is based on applicable State or local law.
For example: If a State law indicates a lien can attach to the consumers acquired property if the charge is not paid, the amount is included as part of Transfer Taxes; If State or local law is unclear or does not specifically attribute the amount to the seller or consumer, disclose the amount apportioned to the consumer using common practice in the locality of the property.
Transfer taxes to be paid by the seller are not disclosed on the Loan Estimate as Transfer Taxes.
The amount of Transfer Taxes disclosed could be modified to the extent the creditor has knowledge of the apportionment of transfer taxes in the contract for sale between the consumer and a seller when it issues the Loan Estimate.
When a creditor does not have the contract of sale when it issues the Loan Estimate, the creditor must use the apportionment of transfer taxes provided for by State or local law, or common practice when State or local law is unclear.
Disclose the sum of all transfer taxes paid by the consumer as Transfer Taxes.
No additional items may be listed or deleted in the Taxes and Other Government Fees category.
No addition or deletion of lines is permitted in this section.
Prepaids 1026.37(g)(2)) Prepaids are items to be paid by the consumer in advance of the first scheduled payment of the loan.
Prepaids are: Real Estate Taxes due within 60 days Past due real estate property taxes Flood Insurance Premiums Homeowners Insurance Premium, Mortgage Insurance Premium, Prepaid Interest, Property Taxes, and Each item must include the applicable time period covered by the amount to be paid by A maximum of three additional items.
Initial Escrow Payment at Closing 1026.37(g)(3)) Initial Escrow Payment at Closing includes items that the consumer will be expected to place into a reserve or escrow account at consummation to be applied to recurring periodic payments.
Initial Escrow Payment at Closing includes: Homeowners Insurance, Mortgage Insurance, Property Taxes, and A maximum of five other items.
Also disclose the amount escrowed per month for each item, the number of months collected at consummation and the total amount paid.
The aggregate adjustment calculation is not included on the Loan Estimate.
Payments for property taxes that are paid at different time periods can be itemized separately.
For example, a general property tax covering a fiscal year from January 1 to December 31 can be listed as a property tax ;and a separate property tax to fund schools that cover a fiscal year from November 1 to October 31 can be added as a separate item.
Other 1026.37(g)(4) Other includes items in connection with the transaction that the consumer is likely to pay or has contracted with a person other than the creditor or loan originator to pay at closing and of which the creditor is aware at the time of issuing the Loan Estimate.
Separate insurance, warranty, guarantee or event-coverage products include, for example: Owners title insurance, Credit life insurance, Debt suspension coverage, Debt cancellation coverage, Warranties of home appliances and systems, and Similar products.
These items are disclosed when coverage is written in connection with a mortgage.
These examples would not include additional coverage and endorsements on insurance otherwise required by the creditor.
Items that disclose any premiums paid for separate insurance, warranty, guarantee, or event- coverage products not required by the creditor must include the parenthetical description (optional) at the end of the label.
Describe services related to the issuance of title insurance policies with the word Title at the beginning of the item..
EXAMPLE When the creditor is aware of those items, Other includes for example: Commissions of real estate brokers or agents, Additional payments to the seller to purchase personal property pursuant to the contract of sale, Homeowners association and condominium charges associated with the transfer of ownership, and Fees for inspections not required by the creditor but paid by the consumer pursuant to the contract of sale.
Owners Title Insurance When the owners title insurance premium includes a simultaneous issuance premium, the premium is calculated by taking the full owners title insurance premium, adding the simultaneous issuance premium for the lenders coverage (if any), and then deducting the full premium for lenders coverage.
Example of Lender/Owner Title Insurance Disclosure with Simultaneous Issue: Example Purchase Transaction Lender Coverage = $200,000 Owner Coverage = $250,000 Lender Premium (no discount) = $400 Owner Premium (no discount)= $675 Simultaneous Issue fee = $50 Owners Premium Calculation: $625 Owner's Premium $50 Simo Fee $400 Lender Premium $275 Disclosed Owner's Premium + - = C .
Services You can Shop For: Title Lenders Title Policy ..$625 SPECIAL NOTE H: Other Title Owners Title Policy (Optional) - $275 As ALTAs Integrated Mortgage Disclosures Task Force reviewed the rule, they discovered that this method of disclosing title premiums created two problems.
First, in areas where it is common for the seller to buy the owners policy, the cash to close disclosed on both forms will be incorrect.
In most states (either by regulation or rate filing) the owners policy is priced as the full-priced policy in a simultaneous issue situation.
Thus, the disclosure will not show the consumer getting the full benefit of negotiating with the seller to purchase the owners policy.
Second, to comply with state rate filings and regulations, title and settlement agents may need to issue a separate title fee disclosure alongside the Closing Disclosure.
Most states require companies only charge rates in accordance with the rate filing.
Agents may want to issue a separate disclosure to show to consumers and regulators that they charged the correct rate amounts despite what the disclosures show.
In its final rule, the CFPB said this method of disclosure can help consumers determine if the additional cost for insurance to protect themselves from losses that result from a title defect and to provide a legal defense from challenges to their legal ownership of the property they are acquiring would be appropriate.
The Bureau did modify its final rule to permit the disclosure of an enhanced owners title insurance policy premium when the creditor knows that an enhanced owners title insurance policy is required by the real estate sales contract.
The Bureau stated in the final rule that it intends to address issues surrounding title insurance, including the differing technical manners in which title insurance premiums are calculated, as part of updates to the special information booklet prescribed by RESPA.
The Bureau plans to revise the booklet prior to the effective date of this final rule.
The Bureau also indicated it may provide additional guidance to consumers about the nature of title insurance, its potential benefits and costs and the manner in which premiums are calculated.
ALTA will continue to work with the Bureau to find a solution to these problems.
ALTA does not expect the Bureau to reverse their policy decision on the disclosure of title fees because they considered some of these issues when ALTA and the California Land Title Association originally brought them up during the public comment period.
However, ALTA believes there may be some guidance the CFPB can provide to offer clarity on how the simultaneous issue may be disclosed.4 3.11.
Total Other Closing Costs 1026.37(g)(6)) Total Closing Costs is the sum of Total Loan Costs, Total Other Costs, and Lender Credits.
Lender Credits is the amount of any payments from the creditor to the consumer that do not pay for a particular fee on the Loan Estimate and is disclosed as a negative number.
For loans where all or a portion of closing costs are offset by a credit or rebate provided by the creditor (sometimes referred to as no cost loans), disclose such credit or rebate as Lender 4 Posted by ALTA Blog at 6:00 AM on 9/16/2014 in Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, Integrated Mortgage Disclosures | Permalink | Comments (0) Credits.
The creditor should ensure that Lender Credits is sufficient to cover the estimated items the creditor represented to the consumer as not being paid by the consumer at consummation, regardless of whether such representations pertained to specific items.
Calculating Cash to Close 1026.37(h) Total Closing Costs is the same amount disclosed as Total Closing Costs in the Other Costs table.
Closing Costs Financed (Paid from Your Loan Amount) Closing Costs Financed (Paid from Your Loan Amount) is calculated by subtracting the estimated total amount of payments to third parties not otherwise disclosed in the Loan Costs and Other Costs (tables from the Loan Amount disclosed on page 1 of the Loan Estimate.
If the result of the calculation is a positive number, Closing Costs Financed (Paid from Your Loan Amount) is that amount, disclosed as a negative number, but only to the extent that it does not exceed the amount of Lender Credits.
If the result of the calculation is zero or negative, then Closing Costs Financed (paid from Your Loan Amount) is $0.
Down Payment/Funds from Borrower In a Purchase transaction, Down Payment/Funds from Borrower is the difference between the purchase price of the property and the principal amount of the loan, disclosed as a positive number.
However, when the loan amount exceeds the purchase price of the property, disclose $0 as Down Payment/Funds from Borrower.
In all other transactions, subtract the principal amount of credit extended (excluding any amount disclosed as Closing Costs Financed (Paid from Your Loan Amount)) from the total amount of all existing debt being satisfied in the transaction.
o When this calculation yields an amount that is positive, Down Payment/ Funds from Borrower is that amount.
o If the calculation yields a result that is negative or $0, Down Payment/ Funds from Borrower is $0.
Deposit In a Purchase transaction, Deposit is the amount, disclosed as a negative number, that is paid to the seller or held in trust or escrow by an attorney or other party under the terms of the contract for sale of the property.
Funds for Borrower In a Purchase transaction, Funds for Borrower is $0.
In all other transactions, subtract the principal amount of debt extended (excluding any amount disclosed as Closing Costs Financed (Paid from Your Loan Amount)) from the total amount of all existing debt being satisfied in the transaction.
o When this calculation yields an amount that is negative, then Funds for Borrower is that amount.
o If the calculation yields an amount that is positive or $0, then Funds for Borrower is $0.
Seller Credits Seller Credits is the total amount that the seller will pay for items included in the Loan Costs and Other Costs tables, to the extent known, disclosed as a negative number.
Adjustments and Other Credits Adjustments and Other Credits is the total amount of all items in the Loan Costs and Other Costs tables that are paid by persons other than the loan originator, creditor, consumer, or seller, together with any other amounts that are required to be paid by the consumer at closing pursuant to the contract of sale (if any), disclosed as a negative number.
Examples of items that are paid by persons other than the loan originator, creditor, consumer, or seller include: Gifts from family members, and Credits from a developer or home builder to be applied to items in the Loan Costs and Other Costs table.
Adjustments and Other Credits includes funds provided to the consumer from the proceeds of subordinate financing, local or State housing assistance grants, or other similar sources.
Examples of amounts to be paid by the consumer at closing pursuant to the contract of sale include: Charges for personal property to be acquired by the consumer, Prorations for property taxes, and Prorations for homeowners association dues.
Adjustment and Other Credits is reduced by the amount of any such additional charges.
Estimated Cash to Close Estimated Cash to Close is calculated as the sum of the seven other amounts disclosed in the Estimated Cash to Close table.
Alternative Calculating Cash to Close table for transactions without a seller.
1026.37(h)(2) An optional Alternative Calculating Cash to Close table can be disclosed for transactions without a seller.
A creditor that uses the optional Alternative Calculating Cash to Close table must also use the alternative disclosure provisions of the Alternative Costs at Closing table on Loan Estimate page 1.
Loan Amount The amount disclosed as Loan Amount is the same amount disclosed as Loan Amount on Loan Estimate page 1.
Total Closing Costs Total Closing Costs is the same amount as Total Closing Costs in the Other Costs table, disclosed as a negative number.
Estimated Payoffs and Payments Estimated Payoffs and Payments is the total amount to be paid to third parties not otherwise disclosed as items in the Loan Costs or Other Costs tables, disclosed as a negative number.
Examples of the Payoffs and Payments to be made to third parties not otherwise disclosed in the Loan Costs or Other Costs tables can include: Payoffs of existing liens secured by the property such as mortgages, deeds of trust, judgments that have attached to the property, Local, State, and Federal tax liens, Mechanics and materialmans liens, Payments of unsecured outstanding debts of the consumer, and Payments to other third parties for outstanding debts of the consumer as required to be paid as a condition for the extension of credit.
Estimated Cash to Close The amount for the Estimated Cash to Close is the sum total of the amounts disclosed as Loan Amount, Total Closing Costs, and Payoffs and Payments.
Check boxes are used to disclose whether the Estimated Cash to Close is either due from the consumer or will be paid to the consumer at consummation.
Estimated Closing Costs Financed Closing Costs Financed is the sum of Loan Amount and Payoffs and Payments, but only to the extent the amount is greater than zero and less than or equal to the sum of Total Closing Costs.
For example: If the Loan Amount is $100,000, the Payoffs and Payments is -$80,000, and the Total Closing Costs is $10,000; then the Closing Costs Financed would be $10,000.
If the Loan Amount is $100,000, the Payoff and Payments is -$95,000, and the Total Closing Costs is $10,000; then the Closing Costs Financed would be $5,000.
If the Loan Amount is $100,000, the Payoffs and Payments is -$110,000 and the Total Closing Costs is $10,000; then the Closing Costs Financed would be $0.
Adjustable Payment (AP) Table 1026.37(i) The Adjustable Payment (AP) Table is disclosed when the periodic principal and interest payment may change after consummation, but not because of a change to the interest rate, or the loan is considered to be a Seasonal Payment product.
If the loan does not contain these features, the AP Table is not disclosed.
The AP Table includes the following information: Whether there are Interest Only Payments, and, if so, the period during which the interest only payment would apply Whether the amount of any periodic payment can be selected by the consumer as an Optional Payment and, if so, the period during which the consumer can select optional payments Whether the loan is a Step Payment product and, if so, the period during which the regular periodic payments are scheduled to increase Whether the loan is a Seasonal Payment product, and, if so, the period during which the periodic payments are not scheduled.
A subheading of Monthly Principal and Interest Payments, that also lists: o As First Change/Amount, the number of the payment that may change, counting from the first periodic payment due after consummation, and the amount or range of the periodic principal and interest payment for such payment.
o The frequency of Subsequent Changes to the periodic payment; and o The Maximum Payment that may be paid during the term of the loan with the number of the first periodic principal and interest payment that can reach such Maximum Payment amount.
First Change/Amount If the exact payment number of the first payment adjustment is not known at the time of the Loan Estimate, the earliest possible payment that may change must be disclosed.
Monthly Principal and Interest Payments The label Monthly Principal and Interest Payments can be changed to reflect a payment schedule that is not monthly, such as Biweekly or Annual.
Disclose any scheduled periodic payment that only covers some or all of the interest that is due and not any principal as Monthly Principal and Interest Payments, even though the AP Table refers to Monthly Principal and Interest Payments.
Adjustable Interest Rate (AIR) Table ( 1026.37(j) The Adjustable Interest Rate (AIR) Table is disclosed when the loans interest rate may increase after consummation.
If the loans interest rate will not increase after consummation, the AIR Table is not disclosed.
The AIR Table includes the following information: As Index + Margin, the index upon which adjustments to the interest rate will be based and the margin that is added to the index to determine the interest rate; For Step Rate products, the maximum amount of any adjustments to the interest rate that are scheduled and pre-determined; The Initial Interest Rate at consummation; The Minimum/Maximum Interest Rate for the loan, after any introductory period; As Change Frequency: o For First Change, list the month when the first interest rate change may occur after consummation; and o As Subsequent Changes, the frequency of interest rate adjustments after the initial adjustment; and As Limits on Interest Rate Changes: o o As First Change, the maximum possible change for the first adjustment of the interest rate after consummation; and As Subsequent Changes, the maximum possible change for subsequent adjustments of the interest rate.
Index and Margin The index must be described such that a consumer can reasonably identify it.
For example, LIBOR may be used instead of the London Interbank Offered Rate.
For example, if the interest rate is calculated by adding 4.25 to LIBOR, the margin should be disclosed as 4.25%.
Maximum/Minimum Interest Rate The maximum interest rate that applies to the loan under applicable law, such as State usury law, must be disclosed if the loan does not provide for a maximum interest rate.
The minimum interest rate that applies to the loan under applicable law must be disclosed if the loan does not provide for a minimum interest rate.
However, if applicable law does not set a minimum interest rate, disclose the amount of the margin as the minimum interest rate.
Change Frequency Typically, the first change month for the interest rate is scheduled in the terms of the loan, but if the exact month is not known at the time creditor provides the Loan Estimate, the earliest possible month for the first change to the interest rate of the loan must be disclosed based on the best information available to the creditor at the time the Loan Estimate is disclosed.
Limits on Interest Rate Changes The greatest limit on changes in the interest rate must be disclosed when more than one limit applies to changes in the interest rate.
For example, if the initial interest rate adjustment is capped at 2%, the second adjustment is capped at 2.5%, and all subsequent adjustments are capped at 3%, 3% is disclosed as Subsequent Changes.
Contact Information 1026.37 (k) Disclose the Name and NMLS/___License ID number for the creditor and mortgage broker, if any, and the individual loan officer of both.
Also, disclose the Email and/or Phone number of the individual loan officer.
The person identified as the individual loan officer must be the primary contact for the consumer.
Comparisons 1026.37 (l) The Comparisons table discloses information related to the costs of the loan In Five Years, the Annual Percentage Rate (APR), and the Total Interest Percentage (TIP).
In 5 Years In 5 Years includes the following information: The total amount the consumer will have paid in principal, interest, mortgage insurance, and loan costs paid through the end of the 60th month after the due date of the first periodic payment; and The amount of principal paid through the end of the 60th month after the due date of the first periodic payment.
Annual Percentage Rate (APR) Disclose the APR, together with a brief descriptive statement, in the Comparisons table on page 3.
For information on how to calculate the APR, see 1026.22 and appendix J to Regulation Z.
Total Interest Percentage (TIP) The TIP is the total amount of interest that the consumer will pay over the loan term, expressed as a percentage of the loan amount.
For example, if the Loan Amount is $100,000 and the total amount of interest that the consumer will pay over the Loan Term is $50,000, then the TIP is 50%.
Other Considerations 1026.37 (m) Other Considerations includes the following information: Appraisal; As Assumption, whether the subsequent purchaser of the property can assume the loan on its original terms; At the option of the creditor, a statement that Homeowners Insurance is required and that the consumer may choose the provider; A statement detailing any amount that may be imposed for a Late Payment; A statement about the nature of a Refinance of the loan in the future; A statement whether the creditor intends to service the loan or transfer it to another servicer; and For Refinance transactions, a statement relating to State law protections against Liability After Foreclosure.
Appraisal A statement concerning the Appraisal must be provided for: Higher-priced Mortgage Loans, and Loans covered by the Equal Credit Opportunity Act.
If the loan is a Higher-priced Mortgage Loan, but is not covered by the Equal Credit Opportunity Act, the word promptly may be removed from the language provided on the model form.
Late Payment An increase in the interest rate triggered by a Late Payment is a charge for late payment.
The following are not charges for Late Payment: The right of acceleration; Fees imposed for actual collection costs; Referral and extension charges; or Interest charged at the contract rate after the payment due date.
Confirm Receipt 1026.37 (n) The consumer is not required to sign the Loan Estimate.
The creditor may add a signature statement and have the consumer sign page 3 of the Loan Estimate in order to Confirm Receipt of the Loan Estimate by the consumer.
If used by the creditor, the signature statement must contain the exact language from the model form.
If the Confirm Receipt table is not used by a creditor, a statement about Loan Acceptance must be included at the end of the Other Consideration table that states, You do not have to accept this loan because you have received this form or signed a loan application.
SECTION THREE Completing the CLOSING DISCLOSURE 12 CFR 1026.38 1.
General Information For Closing Information, disclose the following information: Date Issued is the date the Closing Disclosure is delivered to the consumer, The Closing Date, The Disbursement Date, The name of the Settlement Agent, As File #, the settlement agents file number, The Property address or location, and For the property securing the loan: o o o Sale Price, Appraised Prop.
The Appraised Property Value of the property securing the loan is disclosed for transactions without a seller.
The Estimated Property Value of the property securing the loan is disclosed if the creditor has not obtained an appraisal for transactions without a seller.
Transaction Information 1026.38(a) (4) For Transaction Information, disclose the name of the consumer as Borrower, the name of the seller as Seller, and the name of the creditor as Lender.
The name and address of each consumer and seller in the transaction must be disclosed.
If there is not enough space to show the name and address of all consumers and sellers in the transaction, an additional page may be used and appended to the end of the Closing Disclosure.
Loan Information 1026.38(a) (5) For Loan Information, disclose the Loan Term, Purpose, Product, Loan Type, the creditors loan identification number as Loan ID #, and mortgage insurance case number, if required by the creditor, as MIC # under the Loan Information subheading.
The information disclosed for Loan Term, Purpose, Product, Loan Type, and Loan ID # are determined by the same definitions for those items on the Loan Estimate.
These items should be updated to reflect the terms of the legal obligation at consummation.
Loan Terms 1026.38(b) The Loan Terms table on the Closing Disclosure discloses the same information required to be disclosed on the Loan Estimate, updated to reflect the terms of the legal obligation at consummation.
Projected Payments 1026.38(c) The Projected Payments table on the Closing Disclosure discloses the same information required to be disclosed on the Projected Payments table disclosed on the Loan Estimate, updated to reflect the terms of the legal obligation at consummation.
Costs at Closing The Costs at Closing table discloses: The total amount disclosed as Total Closing Costs in the Other Costs table disclosed on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
Total Closing Costs are also itemized to show the Total Loan Costs, the Total Other Costs, and Lender Credits from the Total Closing Costs subheading disclosed on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure and; The estimated amount of cash the consumer will pay at, or receive from, closing as Cash to Close.
This amount is the same as the Cash to Close calculated in the Calculating Cash to Close table on page 3 of the Closing Disclosure.
Alternative Costs at Closing Disclose the Alternative Costs at Closing table for transactions without a seller where the Alternative Estimated Costs at Closing table was disclosed on the Loan Estimate.
Check boxes are used in order to indicate whether the amount of cash is due from or paid to the consumer at consummation.
If the Alternative Costs at Closing table is used, then the Alternative Calculating Cash to Close on page 3 of the Closing Disclosure must also be used.
PAGE 2 CLOSING DISCLOSURE The number of items in the Loan Costs and Other Costs tables can be expanded and deleted to ensure that the Loan Costs and Other Costs tables fit onto page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
However, items that is required to be disclosed, even if they are not needed (such as Points in the Origination Charges subheading), cannot be deleted.
Loan Costs The items to be disclosed in the Loan Costs table should generally be the same as they were disclosed on the Loan Estimate, updated to reflect the terms of the legal obligation at consummation, except as specifically discussed below.
Origination Charges - Loan Originator Compensation 1026.38 (f)(1) Loan originator compensation is disclosed as Origination Charges, even though loan originator compensation is not disclosed on the Loan Estimate.
Compensation from the consumer to a third-party loan originator is designated as Borrower-Paid At Closing or Before Closing on the Closing Disclosure.
Compensation from the creditor to a third-party loan originator is designated as Paid by Others on the Closing Disclosure.
A designation of (L) can be listed with the amount to indicate that the creditor pays the compensation at consummation.
The amount of compensation from the creditor to the third-party loan originator is the same as the amount of third- party compensation included in points and fees for purposes of determining the consumers ability to pay the loan.
Compensation to individual loan originators is not calculated or disclosed on the Closing Disclosure.
Services the Consumer Did and Did Not Shop For 1026.38 (f)(2) and (f)(3) Items that the consumer could have shopped for, but did not, are disclosed in the Services Borrower Did Not Shop For subheading, regardless of where the item was disclosed on the Loan Estimate.
When a consumer chooses a provider that was on the Written List of Providers for a service, that service is listed as Services Borrower Did Not Shop For in the Closing Disclosure Loan Costs table.)
Items disclosed as Services Borrower Did Shop For and Services Borrower Did Not Shop For are re-alphabetized when an item is added to or removed from the Closing Disclosure, when compared to the Loan Estimate.
Total Loan Costs 1026.38 (f)(14 The amounts that are designated as Borrower-Paid At or Before Closing are subtotaled as Total Loan Costs (Borrower-Paid).
The amounts that are designated Seller-Paid At or Before Closing and Paid by Others are not subtotaled as Total Loan Costs (Borrower-Paid).
Other Costs The items to be disclosed in the Other Costs table should be disclosed as they would be disclosed on the Loan Estimate updated to reflect the terms of the legal obligation and real estate transaction at consummation, except as specifically discussed below.
Taxes and Other Government Fees An itemization of Transfer Taxes paid by the consumer and the seller is disclosed under the heading Taxes and Other Government Fees, instead of the sum total of Transfer Taxes to be paid by the consumer.
Prepaids Prepaids are items to be paid by the consumer in advance of the first scheduled payment of the loan.
Prepaids are: Homeowners Insurance Premium, Mortgage Insurance Premium, Prepaid Interest, Property Taxes, and A maximum of three additional items.
Each item must include the applicable time period covered by the amount to be paid by the consumer and the total amount to be paid.
Initial Escrow Payment at Closing Property Taxes paid during different time periods can be disclosed as separate items.
For example, general property taxes assessed for January 1 to December 31 and property taxes to fund schools for November 1 to October 31 can be disclosed as separate items.
The last item disclosed in the Initial Escrow Payment at Closing is the Aggregate Adjustment.
The Aggregate Adjustment is calculated under Regulation X.
Other Items are disclosed as Other to reflect costs incurred by the consumer or seller that were not required to be disclosed on the Loan Estimate.
These costs include: Real estate brokerage fees, Homeowner or condominium association fees paid at consummation, Home warranties, Inspection fees, and Other fees paid at closing that are not required by the creditor or otherwise required to be disclosed elsewhere on the Closing Disclosure.
The amount of an earnest money deposit does not affect the amount of real estate commissions paid by the consumer or seller on the Closing Disclosure, even if the earnest money deposit is held by the real estate brokerage.
Total Other Costs and Total Closing Costs The total of all closing costs paid by the consumer, reduced by the Lender Credit, is disclosed as Total Closing Costs (Borrower-Paid).
The total of items designated as Borrower-Paid At or Before Closing, Seller-Paid At or Before Closing, and Paid by Others are disclosed as Closing Cost Subtotals.
Lastly, the total amount of Lender Credits, if any, are disclosed and designated as Borrower-Paid At Closing.
Lender Credits All general lender credits, regardless of their reason or source, are included as Lender Credits.
However, if the lender credit is attributable to a charge listed on Closing Disclosure page 2, then the amount should be listed with the item and designated as Paid By Others.
(A designation of (L) can be listed with the amount to indicate that the creditor pays the item at consummation.
The creditor should include the amount of any offset to resolve an excess charge by the creditor as Lender Credits.
A statement that such an amount is paid by the creditor to offset an excess charge, with funds other than closing funds, is also included as part of Lender Credits.
(see form H-25(F) of appendix H to Regulation Z for an example of this statement.)
PAGE 3- CLOSING DISCLOSURE On page 3 of the Closing Disclosure, the Calculating Cash to Close table and Summaries of Transaction table are disclosed.
For transactions without a seller, a Payoffs and Payments table may be substituted for the Summaries of Transactions table and placed before the Alternative Calculating Cash to Close table.
(See Figure 40; form H-25(J) of appendix H to Regulation Z) 4.1.
Calculating Cash to Close (With and Without Seller) 1026.38 (i) Total Closing Costs = Positive Number Total Closing Costs= Negative With a Seller Total Closing Costs Closing Costs Paid Before Closing Closing Costs Financed (Paid from your Loan Amount) Down Payment/Funds from Borrower Deposit Funds for Borrower Seller Credits Adjustments and Other Credits Cash to Close Without A Seller Loan Amount Total Closing Costs Closing Costs Paid Before Closing Total Payoffs and Payments Cash to Close Generally, the amount disclosed in the Loan Estimate column is the same as the amount disclosed on the Loan Estimate or a revised Loan Estimate.
The amounts disclosed in the Loan Estimate column are rounded to the nearest dollar in order to match the corresponding amount disclosed on the Loan Estimates Calculating Cash to Close table.
The amounts in the Final column are calculated using the same methods that were used for the Calculating Cash to Close table on the Loan Estimate, except that the amounts used to determine the amounts are the amounts disclosed on the Closing Disclosure or determined at consummation.
The dollar amounts disclosed under 1026.38 generally are shown to two decimal places unless otherwise required.
As a result, any Final amount that is disclosed in the Calculating Cash to Close is shown to two decimal places unless otherwise required.
However, any Loan Estimate amount that is disclosed in the Calculating Cash to Close table under is shown rounded to the nearest dollar amount, and thus matches the corresponding estimated amount disclosed on the Loan Estimates Calculating Cash to Close which is shown rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
For this reason, a Final amount shown to two decimal places could be a larger number than its corresponding Loan Estimate amount shown rounded to the nearest whole dollar, when, in fact, the apparent increase is due solely to rounding.
Therefore, each statement of a change between the amounts disclosed on the Loan Estimate and the Closing Disclosure is based on the actual, non-rounded estimate that would have been disclosed on the Loan Estimate if it had been shown to two decimal places rather than a whole dollar amount.
For example, if the Loan Estimate amount of Total Closing Costs disclosed is $12,500, and the Final amount of Total Closing Costs disclosed is $12,500.35, then even though the table would appear to show a $0.35 increase in Total Closing Costs, no statement of such increase is given under so long as the actual, non- rounded estimate (i.e., the estimated amount of Total Closing Costs that would have been shown on the Loan Estimate to two decimal places is equal to $12,500.35.
is Yes, indicate where the consumer can find the amounts that have changed on the Loan Estimate.
For example, if the Seller Credit amount changed, the creditor can indicate that the consumer should See Seller Credits in Section L..
In addition, for example, the statement See details in Sections K and L, in which the words Sections K and L are in boldface font, complies with the requirement under 1026.38(i)(8)(iii)(A).
Other examples of language for these items are found in example form H- 25(B) in appendix H of Regulation Z.
Total Closing Costs In the Final column, Total Closing Costs is the same amount as the amount disclosed as Total Closing Costs (Borrower-Paid) on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
However, for refinance transactions, this number will be a negative number.
When the amount in the Final column is different from the amount in the Loan Estimate column, indicate that the consumer should see the Total Loan Costs or Total Other Costs tables, as applicable, on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
Statements and references regarding the total loan costs and total other costs.
Under 1026.38(i)(1)(iii)(A), The statements under the subheading Did this change?
, that the consumer should see the total loan costs and total other costs subtotals disclosed on the Closing Disclosure is made only if and to the extent the difference in the Total Closing Costs is attributable to differences in itemized charges that are included in either or both of such subtotals.
For example, if an increase in the Total Closing Costs is attributable only to an increase in the appraisal fee (which is an itemized charge on the Closing Disclosure under the subheading Services Borrower Did Not Shop For, itself under the heading Loan Costs), then a statement is given under the subheading Did this change?
that the consumer should see the total loan costs subtotal disclosed on the Closing Disclosure.
If the increase in Total Closing Costs is attributable only to an increase in recording fees (which is an itemized charge on the Closing Disclosure under the subheading Taxes and Other Government Fees, itself under the heading Other Costs), then a statement is given under the subheading Did this change?
that the consumer should see the total other costs subtotal disclosed on the Closing Disclosure.
If, however, the increase is attributable in part to an increase in the appraisal fee and in part to an increase in the recording fee, then a statement is given under the subheading Did this change?
that the consumer should see the total loan costs and total other costs subtotals disclosed on the Closing Disclosure under 1026.38(f)(4) and(g)(5).
Increases in Total Closing Costs That Exceed the Legal Limits When the increase in Total Closing Costs exceeds the legal limits, disclose a statement that an increase in closing costs exceeds the legal limits by the dollar amount of the excess in the Did this change?
A statement directing the consumer to the Lender Credit on page 2 must also be included if a credit to the consumer at closing for the excess amount is provided by the creditor.
Example Closing Costs Paid Before Closing The amount disclosed in the Loan Estimate column for the Closing Costs Paid Before Closing item is $0.
The Final column should disclose the same amount designated as Borrower-Paid Before Closing in the Closing Costs Subtotals of the Other Costs table on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
Total Payoffs and Payments Total Payoffs and Payments, should have the same amount in the Final column as the amount disclosed as Total Payoffs and Payments from the Payoffs and Payments table on page 3, as a negative number.
Cash to Close Cash to Close discloses the sum of Loan Amount, Total Closing Costs, Closing Costs Paid Before Closing, and Total Payoffs and Payments in the Loan Estimate and Final columns, with indications of whether the totals are due to or from the consumer.
Closing Costs Financed (Paid from your Loan Amount) Closing Costs Financed (Paid from your Loan Amount) is the sum of the amounts in the Final column of the Loan Amount and Total Payoffs and Payments.
However, the amount is disclosed only if the sum is greater than zero and no larger than the Total Closing Costs (deducting the amount in the Final column of Closing Costs Paid Before Closing).
Summaries of Transactions Use the Summaries of Transactions table to disclose the amounts associated with the real estate purchase transaction between the consumer and seller, together with closing costs, in order to disclose the amounts due from or payable to the consumer and seller at closing, as applicable.
A separate Closing Disclosure can be provided to the consumer and the seller that do not reflect the other partys costs and credits by omitting certain disclosures on each separate Closing Disclosure.
In transactions without a seller, the creditor does not provide the Sellers Transaction column as part of the Closing Disclosure.
A creditor can also decide to replace the Summaries of Transactions table with a Payoffs and Payments table when the Alternative Cash to Close and Alternative Calculating Cash to Close tables are used.
Generally, the Summaries of Transactions table is similar to the Summary of Borrowers Transaction and Summary of Sellers Transaction tables on the HUD-1 Settlement Statement provided under Regulation X prior to the TILA-RESPA rule taking effect.
There are some modifications to the Closing Disclosure related to the handling of the disclosure of the consumers Deposit, the disclosure of Credits, and other matters, discussed below.
Borrowers Transaction A creditor can work with a Settlement Agent, and the Settlement Agent can disclose the Borrowers Transaction column of the Summaries of Transactions table.
Any references to the creditor would apply to the settlement agent when the Settlement Agent discloses the Borrowers Transaction column.
Due From Borrower at Closing The amount Due from Borrower at Closing is the sum of: + Sale Price of Property, + Sale Price of Any Personal Property Included in Sale, + Closing Costs Paid at Closing, + Other consumer charges, + Adjustments, and + Adjustments for Items Paid by the Seller in Advance, pursuant to the terms of the real estate sale contract.
Personal Property is defined by State law, but could include such items as carpets, drapes, and appliances.
Manufactured homes are not considered personal property for the Closing Disclosure.
Closing Costs Paid at Closing is the amount designated as Borrower-Paid At Closing on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
Disclose other consumer charges owed by the consumer in the real estate closing not otherwise disclosed on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure as Due from Borrower at Closing.
Examples include: Amounts paid to any existing holders of liens on the property in a refinance transaction, and Any outstanding real estate property taxes.
These amounts are disclosed without a corresponding credit in the Sellers Transaction column.
Adjustments due from the consumer to be paid to the seller are disclosed in two places.
First, amounts owed by the consumer that are neither disclosed on Closing Disclosure page 2 nor specifically required to be disclosed as Due from Borrower at Closing.
Examples of these amounts include: o A balance in a sellers reserve account transferred to the consumer in connection with an assumed loan, o Rent that the consumer will collect after closing for a period of time prior to the closing, and o The treatment of any tenant security deposit.
Second, additional adjustments are disclosed along with the time-period associated with the adjustment.
Examples include: Taxes paid in advance for an entire year when the closing occurs prior to the expiration of the year, Flood or hazard insurance premiums when the consumer is being substituted as an insured under the same policy, o Mortgage insurance in connection with an assumed loan, o Planned unit development or condominium association assessments paid in advance, o Fuel or other supplies on hand purchased by the seller which the consumer will use when the consumer takes possession of the property, and o Ground rent paid in advance by the seller.
Paid Already By or on Behalf of Borrower at Closing The amount Paid Already by or on Behalf of Borrower at Closing is the sum of: + Deposit, + Loan Amount, + Existing Loan(s) Assumed or Taken Subject to, + Seller Credits, + Other Credits, and + Adjustments for Items Unpaid by Seller pursuant to the terms of the real estate sale contract.
( 1026.38(j)(2)) Deposit is the amount paid into a trust account by the consumer pursuant to a contract of sale.
If the Deposit has been applied toward a closing cost paid by the consumer, the amount so applied should be deducted from the amount of the Deposit.
No deduction in the amount of the Deposit is to be made for the payment of any real estate commission disclosed on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
Existing Loan(s) Assumed is the total amount of all loans that the consumer is assuming in the transaction, even if more than one loan is being assumed.
Seller Credits include any general credit to the consumer from the seller and includes a seller making an allowance to the consumer for items to purchase separately.
However, if the sellers agreement is attributable to a charge listed on Closing Disclosure page 2, then the amount should be listed with the item and designated as Seller-Paid at Closing or Seller-Paid Before Closing on Closing Disclosure page 2.
Seller Credits include any seller credits for issues identified at a walk-through of the Property.
Other Credits include a general credit from any party other than the seller or creditor.
One example is a credit a consumer receives from a real estate agent.
A description of the credit and the name of the party giving the credit must also be included.
However, if the credit or rebate is attributable to a charge listed on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure, then the amount should be listed with the item and designated as Paid by Others on Closing Disclosure page 2.
Other Credits include any transferred escrow balance in a refinance transaction.
Other Credits also include a credit for any money or other payments made by family members associated with the transaction, along with a description of the nature of the funds.
Disclosure of any amount paid with funds other than closing funds by a consumer in connection with a subordinate loan payoff are disclosed with a statement that such amounts were paid with outside of closing funds.
Adjustments for Items Unpaid by Seller are amounts due to the consumer to be paid by the seller and are disclosed in two places.
First, items are disclosed along with the time-period associated with the item.
Examples include: o Taxes paid in arrears for an entire year when the closing occurs prior the start of the year, o Flood or hazard insurance premiums when the consumer is being substituted as an insured under the same policy, o Mortgage insurance in connection with an assumed loan, o Planned unit development or condominium assessments not yet paid, and o Ground rent not yet paid by the seller.
Second, additional amounts owed by the seller that are not disclosed on page2 or specifically included as Due from Seller at Closing.
Examples of these amounts include: o Utilities used but not paid for by the seller; o Rent collected in advance by the seller for a period extending beyond the closing date; and Interest on loan assumptions.
o Cash to Close To or From Borrower Under a subheading of Calculation: Disclose Total Due from the Borrower at Closing as a positive number.
Disclose Total Paid Already by or on Behalf of the Borrower at Closing as a negative number.
Disclose the sum of Total Due from the Borrower at Closing and Total Paid Already by or on Behalf of the Borrower at Closing.
Disclose the sum as Cash to Close From Borrower when the sum is a positive number, and disclose the sum as Cash to Close To Borrower when the result is a negative number.
The sum is disclosed as a positive number in either event.
Sellers Transactions The Settlement Agent completes and discloses the Sellers Transaction column of the Summaries of Transactions table.
Due to Seller at Closing Disclose the amount Due to Seller at Closing as the sum of: + The Sale Price of the Property, + Sale Price of Any Personal Property Included in Sale, + Adjustments, and + Adjustments for Items Paid by Seller in Advance due to the seller pursuant to the terms of the real estate sales contract.
Personal Property is defined by state law, but could include such items as carpets, drapes, and appliances.
Manufactured homes are not considered personal property for the Closing Disclosure.
Adjustments due from the consumer to be paid to the seller are disclosed in two categories: First, amounts owed by the consumer that are neither disclosed on page 2 nor specifically required to be disclosed as Due from Borrower at Closing.
Examples of these amounts include: o A balance in a sellers reserve account transferred to the consumer in connection with an assumed loan, o Rent that the consumer will collect after closing for a period of time prior to the closing, and The treatment of any tenant security deposit.
o Second, Adjustments for Items Paid by Seller in Advance are disclosed along with the time- period associated with the adjustment.
Examples include: o Taxes paid in advance for an entire year when the closing occurs prior the expiration of the year o Flood or hazard insurance premiums when the consumer is being substituted as an insured under the same policy Mortgage insurance in connection with an assumed loan, o o Planned unit development or condominium association assessments paid in advance, o Fuel or other supplies on hand purchased by the seller which the consumer will use when the consumer takes possession of the property, and o Ground rent paid in advance by the seller.
Due from Seller at Closing Disclose the amount Due from Seller at Closing as the sum of: + Any Excess Deposit, + Closing Costs Paid at Closing by the Seller, + Existing Loan(s) Assumed or Taken Subject to by the consumer, + Payoff of First Mortgage Loan, + Payoff of Second Mortgage Loan, + + Seller Credit, + Adjustments, and + Adjustments for Items Unpaid by Seller due to the consumer pursuant to the terms of Payment of other seller obligations, the real estate sale contract.
Excess Deposit is the amount of any deposit made by the consumer that has been disbursed to the seller prior to closing.
Seller Credit is an amount the seller is giving as a general credit not tied to a specific charge on page 2 or is making as an allowance to the consumer for items to purchase separately.
The amount of Seller Credit would include any credits to the consumer as the result of a walk- through of the property prior to the closing.
However, if the amount of a credit is attributable to a charge listed on page 2, then the amount should be listed with the applicable item on page 2 and designated as Seller-Paid At Closing or Seller- Paid Before Closing, as appropriate.
Disclose the Payoff of the First Mortgage Loan, if any, and then the Payoff of the Second Mortgage Loan, if anyDisclose the payoff or satisfaction amounts for any additional seller obligations as separately itemized amounts.
Examples of these seller bligations include, but are not limited to: Satisfaction of outstanding liens imposed due to Federal, State or local income taxes, Real estate property tax liens, Judgments against the seller reduced to a lien upon the property, Other obligations the seller wishes the Settlement Agent to pay from the sellers proceeds at closing, and Funds to be held by the Settlement Agent for repairs or the payment of water, fuel, or other utility bills that cannot be prorated between the parties at closing because the amounts used by the seller prior to closing are not yet known at closing.
Subsequent disclosure of a revised Closing Disclosure after the repairs are made or the utility bill is received is optional.
Disclose any amount paid with funds other than closing funds in connection with a subordinate loan payoff with a statement that such amounts were paid from outside of closing funds.
Adjustments for Items Unpaid by Seller due to the consumer to be paid by the seller pursuant to the real estate sales contract has two components: First, disclose amounts owed by the seller with the time period associated with the adjustments.
Examples include: o Taxes paid in arrears for an entire year when the closing occurs prior the start of the year, o Flood or hazard insurance premiums when the consumer is being substituted as an assured under the same policy, o Mortgage insurance in connection with an assumed loan, o Planned unit development or condominium assessments not yet paid, and o Ground rent not yet paid by the seller.
Second, disclose amounts owed by the seller that are neither disclosed on page 2 nor specifically disclosed as Due from Seller at Closing.
Examples of these amounts include: o Utilities used but not paid for by the seller, o Rent collected in advance by the seller from a tenant for a period of extending beyond the closing date, and Interest on loan assumptions.
o Cash to Close Due to or From Seller Under a subheading of Calculation: Disclose Total Due to the Seller at Closing, as a positive number.
Disclose Total Due from Seller at Closing, as a negative number.
Disclose the sum of Total Due to the Seller at Closing and Total Due from Seller at Closing as a positive number.
When the result is a positive number, disclose the amount as Cash to Seller.
When the result is a negative number, disclose the amount as Cash from Seller.
The sum is disclosed as a positive number in either event.
Loan Disclosure Table 1026.38(l)(1-6); In the Loan Disclosures table, disclose: Information concerning future Assumption of the loan by a subsequent purchasers Whether the legal obligation contains a Demand Feature that can require early payment of the loan, The terms of the legal obligation that impose a fee for a Late Payment including the amount of time that passes before a fee is imposed and the amount of such fee or how it is calculated, Whether the regular periodic payments can cause the principal balance of the loan to increase, creating Negative Amortization, The creditors policy in relation to Partial Payments by the consumer, A statement that the consumer is granting a Security Interest in the Property (along with an identification of the Property), and Information related to any Escrow Account held by the servicer (or a statement that an Escrow Account has not been established with a description of estimated property costs during the first year after consummation).
Escrow Account 1026.38(l)(7); When an Escrow Account is established, disclose: The amount of Escrowed Property Costs over Year 1 with a list of the costs that will be paid by the Escrow Account, The amount of Non-Escrowed Property Costs over Year 1 with a list of the costs that will not be paid by the Escrow Account (to the extent there is room to list the costs in the space provided), Initial Escrow Payment and Monthly Escrow Payment.
When an Escrow Account is not established, disclose: The amount of Estimated Property Costs over Year 1, and The amount of any Escrow Waiver Fee imposed for waiving the creation of an Escrow Account with the loan.
Property Costs include: Property Taxes, Homeowners Insurance, Charges imposed by a cooperative, condominium or homeowners association, Ground rent, Leasehold payments, and Certain insurance premiums or charges if required by the lender.
The Initial Escrow Payment is the same amount disclosed as the subtotal of the Initial Payment at Closing on page 2 of the Closing Disclosure.
Adjustable Payment (AP) Table 1026.38(m) Disclose the Adjustable Payment (AP) Table when the periodic principal and interest payment may change after consummation, but not because of a change to the interest rate, or the loan is a seasonal payment product.
If the loan does not contain these features, do not disclose the AP Table.
(The same information that was or would have been disclosed in the AP Table on the Loan Estimate is disclosed in the AP Table on Closing Disclosure page 4, updated to reflect the terms of the loan at consummation.
Adjustable Interest Rate Table 1026.38(n) Disclose the Adjustable Interest Rate (AIR) Table when the loans interest rate may increase after consummation.
If the loans interest rate will not increase after consummation, do not disclose the AIR Table.)
The same information that was or would have been disclosed in the AIR Table on the Loan Estimate is disclosed in the AIR Table on Closing Disclosure page 4, updated to reflect the terms of the loan at consummation.
Loan calculations 1026.38(0)(1-5) Disclose the Total of Payments, the Finance Charge, the Amount Financed, the APR, and the Total Interest Percentage (TIP) in the Loan Calculations table.
( 1026.38(o)) The APR and TIP amounts should be updated from the amounts disclosed on the Loan Estimate to reflect the terms of the legal obligation at consummation.
Other Disclosures 1026.38(p)(1-5) The creditor discloses in the Other Disclosures table: A statement related to the consumers rights in relation to any Appraisal conducted for the property, A statement informing the consumer of consequences of on payment, what constitutes default, when a creditor can accelerate maturity, and prepayment rebates and penalties pursuant to Contract Details A statement of whether State law provides for continued consumer responsibility for any Liability after Foreclosure, A statement concerning the consumers ability to Refinance the loan, and A statement concerning the extent that interest on the loan can be included as a Tax Deduction by the consumer.
( 1026.38(p)) Appraisal A statement concerning the Appraisal must be provided for: Higher-priced Mortgage Loans, and Loans covered by the Equal Credit Opportunity Act.
( 1026.37(m)(1)) For these transactions, the creditor must provide the following statement: If the property was appraised for your loan, your lender is required to give you a copy at no additional cost at least 3 days before closing.
If you have not yet received it, please contact your lender at the information below.
Contact Information 1026.38(r)(1-7) In the Contact Information table, disclose the following information for the Lender, the Mortgage Broker, the consumers Real Estate Brokerage, the sellers Real Estate Brokerage, and the Settlement Agent in a columnar format: Name, Address, The NMLS or State license ID, as applicable, The Contact name of an individual (and the NMLS or State license ID), Email, and Phone number.
( 1026.38(r)) Unused columns may be removed and columns may be added for additional parties.
For example: If there are two real estate brokers representing the seller, a column may be added to identify that party and a column for a party not involved in the transaction may be deleted.
Confirm Receipt 1026.38(r)(1-7) The creditor, at its option, may include a line for the signatures of the consumers to Confirm Receipt.
If the creditor includes a signature line to Confirm Receipt, the creditor must also include a statement that the signature only signifies receipt of the Closing Disclosure.
If the creditor does not include statement line or the consumers signature, add a statement to the Other Disclosures concerning Loan Acceptance that states: You do not have to accept this loan because you have received this form or signed a loan application.
SECTION FOUR Additional Resources Investor Title Insurance Company Reference Manual CFPB eRegulations http://www.consumerfinance.gov/eregulations/1026 CFPB Guides and Sample Forms http://www.consumerfinance.gov/regulatory-implementation/tila-respa/ Integrated Disclosure Final Rule http://www.consumerfinance.gov/regulations/integrated-mortgage-disclosures-under-the-real- estate-settlement-procedures-act-regulation-x-and-the-truth-in-lending-act-regulation-z/
